Missouri, session 2026, SB888.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 43.503, 211.021, 211.071, 211.319,
2
211.331, 211.341, 211.436, 217.362, 217.690, 217.760, 556.061,
3
557.011, 557.021, 558.011, 558.016, 558.019, 558.026, 558.031,
4
558.046, 559.115, 566.030, 566.032, 566.060, 566.103, 566.125,
5
566.203, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 568.045, 568.060, and
6
589.425, RSMo, are repealed and thirty-four new sections
7
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 43.503,
8
211.021, 211.071, 211.319, 211.331, 211.341, 211.342, 211.436,
9
217.362, 217.690, 217.760, 556.061, 557.011, 557.021, 558.011,
10
558.016, 558.019, 558.026, 558.031, 558.046, 559.115, 566.030,
11
566.032, 566.060, 566.103, 566.125, 566.203, 566.209, 566.210,
12
566.211, 568.045, 568.060, 589.425, and 1, to read as follows:
1
43.503. 1. For the purpose of maintaining complete
2
and accurate cri m inal history record information, all police
3
officers of this state, the clerk of each court, the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SS#3 SB 888 2
4
department of corrections, the sheriff of each county, the
5
chief law enforcement official of a city not within a county
6
and the prosecuting attorney of each county or the circuit
7
attorney of a city not within a county shall submit certain
8
criminal arrest, charge, and disposition information to the
9
central repository for filing without undue delay in the
10
form and manner required by sections 43.500 to 43.651.
11
2. All law enforcement agencies making misdemeanor and
12
felony a rrests as determined by section 43.506 shall furnish
13
without undue delay, to the central repository,
14
fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any other unique
15
biometric identification collected, charges, appropriate
16
charge codes, and descriptions of all persons who are
17
arrested for such offenses on standard fingerprint forms
18
supplied or approved by the highway patrol or electronically
19
in a format and manner approved by the highway patrol and in
20
compliance with the standards set by the Federal Bureau of
21
Investigation in its Automated Fingerprint Identification
22
System or its successor program. All such agencies shall
23
also notify the central reposito r y of all decisions not to
24
refer such arrests for prosecution. An agency making such
25
arrests may enter into arrangements with other law
26
enforcement agencies for the purpose of furnishing without
27
undue delay such fingerprints, photograph, and if available,
28
any other unique biometric identification collected,
29
charges, appropriate charge codes, and descriptions to the
30
central repository upon its behalf.
31
3. In order for the Missouri office of prosecution
32
service s to maintain complete and accurate statewide reports
33
as required by section 56.750, on or before January 1, 2028,
34
and thereafter, all police officers of this state, the
35
sheriff and each deputy sheriff of each county, and the

SS#3 SB 888 3
36
chief law enforcement official of a city not within a county
37
and his or her officers shall submit referrals for any
38
traffic violation, ordinance violation, or misdemeanor or
39
felony offense referred to a prosecuting or circuit attorney
40
in the form and manner approved by the Missouri office of
41
prosecution services as required by subdivision (7) of
42
subsection 1 of section 56.750. At a minimum, any referral
43
to a prosecuting attorney or ci r cuit attorney for a felony
44
offense shall include a probable cause statement and an
45
investigative report. Any law enforcement agency that
46
violates this subsecti on shall be ineligible to receive
47
state or federal funds that would otherwise be paid to such
48
agency for law enforcement, safety, or criminal justice
49
purposes.
50
4. In instances where an individual [less than
51
sevente e n] under eighteen years of age and not currently
52
certified as an adult is taken into custody for an offense
53
[which] that would be a class A or B felony, felony under
54
chapter 566, or two felony offenses arising from distinct
55
acts committed within one year of each other, if committed
56
by an adult, the arresting officer shall take fingerprints
57
for the central repository. These fingerprints shall be
58
taken on fingerprint cards s upplied by or approved by the
59
highway patrol or transmitted electronically in a format and
60
manner approved by the highway patrol and in compliance with
61
the standards set by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in
62
its Automated Fingerprint Identification System or its
63
successor program. [The fingerprint cards shall be so
64
constructed that t h e name of the juvenile should not be made
65
available to the central repository.] The individual's name
66
and the unique number associated with the fingerprints and
67
other pertinent information shall be provided to the court

SS#3 SB 888 4
68
of jurisdiction by the agency taking the juvenile into
69
custody. The juvenile's fingerprints and other information
70
shall be forwarded to the central repository and the courts
71
without undue delay. The fingerprint information from the
72
card shall be captur e d and stored in the automated
73
fingerprint identification system operated by the central
74
repository. In the event the fingerprints are found to
75
match other tenprints or unsolved latent prints, the central
76
repository shall notify the submitting agency who shall
77
notify the court of jurisdiction as per local agreement.
78
Under section 211.031, in instances where a juvenile ove r
79
fifteen and one-half years of age is alleged to have
80
violated a state or municipal traffic ordinance or
81
regulation, which does not constitute a felony, and the
82
juvenile court does not have jurisdiction, the juvenile
83
shall not be fingerprinted unless certified as an adult.
84
Records of a juvenile who has been fingerprinted under t h is
85
subsection shall be closed records as provided under section
86
610.120.
87
5. Upon certification of the individual as an adult,
88
the cer t ifying court shall order a law enforcement agency to
89
immediately fingerprint and photograph the individual and
90
certification papers will be forwarded to the appropriate
91
law enforcement agency with the order for fingerprinting.
92
The law enforcement agency shall submit such fingerprints ,
93
photograph, and certification papers to the central
94
repository within fifteen days and shall furnish the offense
95
cycle number associated with the fingerprints to the
96
prosecuting attorney or the circuit attorney of a city not
97
within a county and to the clerk of the court ordering the
98
subject fingerprinted. If the juvenile is acquitted of the
99
crime and is no longer certified as an adult, the

SS#3 SB 888 5
100
prosecuting attorney shall notify within fifteen days the
101
central repository of the change of status of the juvenile.
102
Records of a child who has been fingerprinted and
103
photographed after being taken into custody shall be closed
104
records as provided under section 610.100 if a petition has
105
not been filed within thirty days of the date that the child
106
was taken into custody; and if a petition for the child has
107
not been filed within one year of the date the child was
108
taken into custody, any records relating to the child
109
concerning the alleged offense may be expunged under the
110
procedures in sections 610.122 to 610.126.
111
6. The prosecuting attorney of each county or the
112
circuit attorney of a city not within a county or the
113
municipal prosecuting attorney shall notify the central
114
repository on standard forms supplied by the highway patrol
115
or in a manner approved by the highway patrol of his or her
116
decision to not file a criminal charge on any charge
117
referred to such prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney
118
for criminal charges. All records forwarded to the central
119
repository and the co u rts by prosecutors or circuit
120
attorneys as required by sections 43.500 to 43.530 shall
121
include the state offense cycle number of the offense, the
122
charge code for the offense, and the originating agency
123
identifier number of the reporting prosecutor, using such
124
numbers as assigned by the highway patrol.
125
7. The clerk of the courts of each county or city not
126
within a county or municipal court clerk shall furnish the
127
central repository, on standard forms supplied by the
128
highway patrol or in a manner approved by the highway
129
patrol, with a record of all charges filed, including all
130
those added subsequent to the filing of a criminal court
131
case, amended charges, and all final dispositions of cases

SS#3 SB 888 6
132
for which the central repository has a record of an arrest
133
or a record of fingerprints reported pursuant to sections
134
43.500 to 43.506. Such information shall include, for each
135
charge:
136
(1) All judgments of not guilty, acquittals on the
137
ground o f mental disease or defect excluding responsibility,
138
judgments or pleas of guilty including the sentence, if any,
139
or probation, if any, pronounced by the court, nolle pros,
140
discharges, releases and dismissals in the trial court;
141
(2) Court orders filed with the clerk of the courts
142
which re v erse a reported conviction or vacate or modify a
143
sentence;
144
(3) Judgments terminating or revoking a sentence to
145
probatio n , supervision or conditional release and any
146
resentencing after such revocation; and
147
(4) The offense cycle number of the offense, and the
148
originat i ng agency identifier number of the sentencing
149
court, using such numbers as assigned by the highway patrol.
150
8. The clerk of the courts of each county or city not
151
within a county shall furnish, to the department of
152
corrections or department of mental health, court judgment
153
and sentence documents and the state offense cycle number
154
and the charge code of the offense which resulted in the
155
commitment or assignment of an offender to the jurisdiction
156
of the department of corrections or the department of mental
157
health if the person is committed pursuant to chapter 552.
158
This information shall be reported to the department of
159
corrections or the department of mental health at the time
160
of commitment or assignment. If the offender was already in
161
the custody of the departmen t of corrections or the
162
department of mental health at the time of such subsequent
163
conviction, the clerk shall furnish notice of such

SS#3 SB 888 7
164
subsequent conviction to the appropriate department by
165
certified mail, return receipt requested, or in a manner and
166
format mutually agreed to, within fifteen days of such
167
disposition.
168
9. Information and fingerprints, photograph and if
169
availab l e, any other unique biometric identification
170
collected, forwarded to the central repository, normally
171
obtained from a person at the time of the arrest, may be
172
obtained at any time the subject is in the criminal justice
173
system or committed to the department of mental health. A
174
law enforcement agency or the department of corrections may
175
fingerprint, photograph, and capture any other unique
176
biometric identification of the person unless collecting
177
other unique biometric identification of the person is not
178
financially feasible for the law enforcement agency, and
179
obtain the necessary information at any time the subject is
180
in custody. If at the time of any court appearance, the
181
defendant h a s not been fingerprinted and photographed for an
182
offense in which a fingerprint and photograph is required by
183
statute to be collected, maintained, or disseminated by the
184
central repository, the court shall order a law enforcement
185
agency or court marshal to fingerprint and photograph
186
immediately the defendant. The order for fingerprints shall
187
contain the offense, charg e code, date of offense, and any
188
other information necessary to complete the fingerprint
189
card. The law enforcement agency or court marshal shall
190
submi t such fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any
191
other unique biometric identification collected, to the
192
central repository without undue delay and within thirty
193
days and shall furnish the offense cycle number associated
194
with the fingerprints to the prosecuting attorney or the

SS#3 SB 888 8
195
circuit attorney of a city not within a county and to the
196
court clerk of the court ordering the subject fingerprinted.
197
10. The department of corrections and the department
198
of menta l health shall furnish the central repository with
199
all information concerning the receipt, escape, execution,
200
death, release, pardon, parole, commutation of sentence,
201
granting of executive clemency, legal name change, or
202
discharge of an individual who has been sentenced to that
203
department's custody for any offenses which are mandated by
204
law to be collected, maintained or disseminated by the
205
central repository. All records forwarded to the central
206
repository by the d e partment as required by sections 43.500
207
to 43.651 shall include the offense cycle number of the
208
offense, and the originating agency identifier number of the
209
department using such numbers as assigned by the highway
210
patrol.
1
211.021. As used in this chapter, unless the context
2
clearly requi r es otherwise, the following terms shall mean:
3
(1) "Adult" [means], a person eighteen years of age or
4
older;
5
(2) "Child" [means], any person under eighteen years
6
of age;
7
(3) "Juvenile court" [means], the juvenile division or
8
division s of the circuit court of the county, or judges
9
while hearing juvenile cases assigned to them;
10
(4) "Juvenile detention facility", a place for the
11
temporar y care of a juvenile in judicial custody in a
12
proceeding under subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 1 of
13
section 211.031 and includes a place that is physically
14
confining, but does not include a jail or other adult
15
detention facility unless the juvenile is seventeen years of
16
age or older or unless the juvenile detention facility is

SS#3 SB 888 9
17
operated, administered, and staffed separately and
18
independently of a jail or other adult detention facility
19
and used exclusively for the lawful custody and treatment of
20
juveniles. A juvenile detention facility may be located in
21
the same bu ilding or grounds as a jail or other adult
22
detention facility if there is spatial separation between
23
the facilities which prevents haphazard or accidental
24
contact between juvenile and adult detainees; there is
25
separation between juvenile and adult program activities;
26
and there are separate juvenile and adult staff other than
27
specialized support staff who have infrequent contact with
28
detainees. The facility may be owned or operated by public
29
or private agencies;
30
(5) "Legal custody" [means], the right to the care,
31
custody a nd control of a child and the duty to provide food,
32
clothing, shelter, ordinary medical care, education,
33
treatment and discipline of a child. Legal custody may be
34
taken from a parent only by court ac t ion and if the legal
35
custody is taken from a parent without termination of
36
parental rights, the parent's duty to provide support
37
continues even though the person having legal custody may
38
provide the necessities of daily living;
39
[(5)] (6) "Parent" [means], either a natural parent or
40
a parent b y ad o ption and if the child is illegitimate,
41
"parent" means the mother;
42
[(6)] (7) "Shelter care" [means], the temporary care
43
of juvenil es i n physically unrestricting facilities pending
44
final court disposition. These facilities may include:
45
(a) "Foster home", t he private home of foster parents
46
providin g twenty-four-hour care to one to three children
47
unrelated to the foster parents by blood, marriage or
48
adoption;

SS#3 SB 888 10
49
(b) "Group foster home", the private home of foster
50
parents p roviding twenty-four-hour care to no more than six
51
children unrelated to the foster parents by blood, marriage
52
or adoption;
53
(c) "Group home", a child care facility which
54
approxim a tes a family setting, provides access to community
55
activities and resources, and provides care to no more than
56
twelve children.
1
211.071. 1. (1) If a petition or motion to modify
2
alleges that a ch i ld b e tween the ages of fourteen and
3
eighteen has committed an offense that would be considered a
4
class A or B felony, felony under chapter 566, or three
5
felony offenses arising from distinct acts committed within
6
one hundred eighty days of each other, if committed by an
7
adult, the court may, upon its own motion or upon motion by
8
the juvenile officer, the office of the prosecuting or
9
circuit attorney, the child, or the child's custodian, order
10
a hearing at which the prosecuting or circuit attorney may
11
present evidence if the prosecuting or circuit attorney
12
filed the petition, and may, in its discretion, dismiss the
13
petition or motion to modify and such child may be
14
transferred to the court of general jurisdiction and
15
prosecuted under the general law; except that, if a petition
16
alleges that a child between the ages of twelve and eighteen
17
has committed an offense that would be considered first
18
degree murder under section 565.020, second degree murder
19
under section 565.021, first degree assault under section
20
565.050, forcible rape under section 566.030 as it existed
21
prior to August 28, 2013, rape in the first degree under
22
section 566.030, forcible sodomy under section 566.060 as it
23
existed prior to August 28, 2013, sodomy in the first degree
24
under section 566.060, first degree robbery under section

SS#3 SB 888 11
25
569.020 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, robbery in
26
the first degree under section 570.023, distribu tion of
27
drugs under section 195.211 as it existed prior to January
28
1, 2017, or the manufacturing of a controlled substance
29
under section 579.055, if committed by an adult, or a
30
dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061, or any
31
felony involving the use, assistance, or aid of a deadly
32
weapon, or has committed two or more prior unrelated
33
offenses that would be felonies if committed by an adult,
34
the court shall order a hearing, and may, in its discretion,
35
dismiss the petition or motion to modify and transfer the
36
child to a court of general jurisdiction for prosecution
37
under the general law.
38
(2) The moving party shall be solely responsible for
39
all duti e s enumerated under this section. If the juvenile
40
officer forwards to the prosecuting or ci r cuit attorney a
41
class A or B felony that is not certified by the juvenile
42
officer, the prosecuting or circuit attorney shall notify
43
the juvenile officer within fourteen days of the decision to
44
certify the case.
45
2. Upon apprehension and arrest, jurisdiction over the
46
crimina l offense allegedly committed by any person between
47
eighteen and twenty-one years of age over whom the juvenile
48
court has retained continuing jurisdiction shall
49
automatically terminate and that offense shall be dealt with
50
in the court of general jurisdiction as provided in section
51
211.041.
52
3. Knowing and willful age misrepresentation by a
53
juvenil e subject shall not affect any action or proceeding
54
which occurs based upon the misrepresentation. Any evidence
55
obtained during the period of time in which a c hild
56
misrepresents his or her age may be used against the child

SS#3 SB 888 12
57
and will be subject only to rules of evidence applicable in
58
adult proceedings.
59
4. Written notification of a transfer hearing shall be
60
given t o the juvenile and his or her custodian in the same
61
manner as provided in sections 211.101 and 211.111. Notice
62
of the hearing may be waived by the custodian. Noti c e shall
63
contain a statement that the purpose of the he a ring is to
64
determine whether the child is a proper subject to be dealt
65
with under the provisions of this chapter, and that if the
66
court finds that the child is not a proper subject to be
67
dealt with under the provisions of this chapter, the
68
petition or motion to modify will be dismissed to allow for
69
prosecution of the child under the general law.
70
5. The juvenile officer [may] shall consult with the
71
office o f prosecuting or circuit attorney concerning any
72
offense for which the child could be certified as an adult
73
under this section. The prosecuting or circuit attorney
74
shall [have access t o] be provided police reports, reports
75
of the juvenile or deputy juvenile officer, statements of
76
witnesses, a copy of the completed Missouri Juvenile
77
Detention Assessment Form (JDTA) or similar form that was
78
used in determining detention, and all other records or
79
reports relating to the offense alleged to have been
80
committed by the child. The prosecuting or circuit attorney
81
shall have access to th e disposition records of the child
82
when the child has been adjudicated pursuant to subdivision
83
(3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031. The prosecuting or
84
circuit attorney shall not divulge any i nformation regarding
85
the child and the offense until the juvenile court at a
86
judicial hearing has determined that the child is not a
87
proper subject to be dealt with under the provisions of this

SS#3 SB 888 13
88
chapter. Any sanction recommended as a result of the JDTA
89
shall be used as a guideline and shall not be mandatory.
90
6. In every incident, the juvenile officer shall
91
conside r legally sufficient charges submitted by a law
92
enforcement agency when utilizing the JDTA form to determine
93
whether or not to detain a child and shall provide a copy of
94
that completed JDTA form to the law enforcement agency once
95
a determination has been made. For purposes of this
96
section, the term "legally suf f icient" means a reasonable
97
belief with articulable facts that a crime has been or is
98
being committed based on the totality of the circumstances.
99
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or the
100
Missour i supreme court operating rules to the contrary, law
101
enforcement agencies who detain juveniles for offenses where
102
fingerprinting is required, shall collect fingerprints and
103
forward detention information to the central repository, in
104
a manner prescribed by the central repository. The juvenile
105
officer and court of jurisdiction over the juv e nile offender
106
shall report all adjudication, delinquency, and custody
107
information to the central repository, in a manner
108
prescribed by the central repository. All information
109
reported under this section shall be a vailable to criminal
110
justice agencies for the administration of criminal justice
111
under section 43.500 through the Missouri Uniform Law
112
Enforcement System (MULES). Such records maintained by the
113
central repository under thi s subsection shall be closed
114
pursuant to section 610.120.
115
8. A written report sha l l be prepared in accordance
116
with th i s chapter developing fully all available information
117
relevant to the criteria which shall be considered by the
118
court in determining whether the child is a proper subject
119
to be dealt with under the provisions of this chapter and

SS#3 SB 888 14
120
whether there are reasonable prospects of rehabilitation
121
within the juvenile justice system. These criteria shall
122
include but not be limited to:
123
(1) The seriousness of the offense alleged and whether
124
the prot e ction of the community requires transfer to the
125
court of general jurisdiction;
126
(2) Whether the offense alleged involved viciousness,
127
force an d violence;
128
(3) Whether the offense alleged was against persons or
129
property with greater weight being given to the offense
130
against persons, especially if personal injury resulted;
131
(4) Whether the offense alleged is a part of a
132
repetiti v e pattern of offenses which indicates that the
133
child may be beyond rehabilitation under the juvenile code;
134
(5) The record and history of the child, including
135
experien c e with the juvenile justice system, other courts,
136
supervision, commitments to juvenile institutions and other
137
placements;
138
(6) The sophistication and maturity of the child as
139
determin e d by consideration of his or her home and
140
environmental situation, emotional condition and pattern of
141
living;
142
(7) The age of the child;
143
(8) The program and facilities available to the
144
juvenile court in considering disposition;
145
(9) Whether or not the child can benefit from the
146
treatmen t or rehabilitative programs available to the
147
juvenile court; and
148
(10) Racial disparity in certification.
149
[7.] 9. If the court dismisses the petition to permit
150
the child to be prosecuted under the general law, the court
151
shall enter a dismissal order containing:

SS#3 SB 888 15
152
(1) Findings showing that the court had jurisdiction
153
of the c a use and of the parties;
154
(2) Findings showing that the child was represented by
155
counsel;
156
(3) Findings showing that the hearing was held in the
157
presence of the child and his or her counsel; and
158
(4) Findings showing the reasons underlying the
159
court's d ecision to transfer jurisdiction.
160
[8.] 10. A copy of the petition or motion to modify
161
and order of t h e dismi ss al s hall be se nt to the pr osecuti ng
162
att orney.
163
[9.] 11. When a petition or motion to modify has been
164
dismissed the r eby permitting a child to be prosecuted under
165
the general law and the prosecution of the child results in
166
a conviction, the jurisdiction of the juvenile court over
167
that child is forever terminated, except as provided in
168
subsection [10] 12 of this section, for an act that would be
169
a violation of a state law or municipal ordinance.
170
[10.] 12. If a petition or motion to modify has been
171
dismissed ther e by permitting a child to be prosecuted under
172
the general law and the child is found not guilty by a court
173
of general jurisdiction, the juvenile court shall have
174
jurisdiction over any later offense committed by that child
175
which would be considered a misdemeanor or felony if
176
committed by an adult, subject to the certification
177
provisions of this section.
178
[11.] 13. If the court does not dismiss the petition
179
or motion to m o dify to permit the child to be prosecuted
180
under the general law, it shall set a date for the hearing
181
upon the petition as provided in section 211.171.
1
211.319. 1. On or before July 1, 2005, all juvenile
2
court proceed i ngs conducted pursuant to subdivision (1) of

SS#3 SB 888 16
3
subsection 1 of section 211.031 and for termination of
4
parental rights cases pursuant to sections 211.442 to
5
211.487 initiated by a juvenile officer or the division
6
shall be open to the public; except that, when the parent
7
has consented in writing to the termination of his or her
8
parental rights in conjunction with a placement with a
9
licensed child-placing agency under subsection 6 of section
10
453.010, the hearing shall be closed. The court, on its own
11
motion, may exclude for good cause sh o wn any person or
12
persons from the proceedings to protect the welfare and best
13
interests of the child and for exceptional circumstances.
14
Any party to a juvenile court proceeding referred to in t h is
15
subsection, except the state, may file a motion requesting
16
that the general public be excluded from the proceeding or
17
any portion of the proceeding. Upon the filing of such
18
motion, the court shall hear a r guments by the parties, but
19
no evidence, and shall make a determination whether closure
20
is in the best interest of the parties or whether it is in
21
the public interest to deny such motion. The court shall
22
make a finding on the record when a moti o n to close a
23
hearing pursuant to this section is made and heard by the
24
court.
25
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
26
this se c tion, the general public shall be excluded from all
27
juvenile court proceedings referred to in subsection 1 of
28
this section during the testimony of any child or victim and
29
only such persons who have a direct interest in the case or
30
in the work of the court will be admitted to the proceedings.
31
3. For juvenile court proceedings described in
32
subsect i on 1 of this section, pleadings and orders of the
33
juvenile court other than confidential files and those
34
specifically ordered closed by the juvenile court judge

SS#3 SB 888 17
35
shall be open to the general public. For purposes of this
36
section, "confidential file" means a l l other records and
37
reports considered closed or confidential by law, including
38
but not limited to medical reports, psychological or
39
psychiatric evaluations, investigation reports of the
40
children's division, social histories, home studies, and
41
police reports and law enforcement records. Only persons
42
who are found by the court to have a legiti m ate interest
43
shall be allowed access to confidential or closed files. In
44
determining whether a person has a legitimate interest, t he
45
court shall consider the nature of the proceedings, the
46
welfare and safety of the public, and the interest of any
47
child involved.
48
4. For records made available to the public pursuant
49
to this section:
50
(1) The identity of any child involved except the
51
perpetra t or shall not be disclosed and all references in
52
such records to the identity of any child involved except
53
the perpetrator shall be redacted prior to disclosure to the
54
public; and
55
(2) All information that may identify or lead to the
56
disclosu r e of the identity of a reporter of child abuse
57
under sections 210.109 to 210.183 and section 352.400 shall
58
not be disclosed to the public.
59
5. All juvenile court proceedings conducted pursuant
60
to subd i vision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031 shall
61
not be open to the general public.
62
6. The provisions of this section shall apply to
63
juvenil e court proceedings and records specified in this
64
section in which the initial pleadings are filed on or after
65
July 1, 2005.

SS#3 SB 888 18
1
211.331. 1. In each county of the first and second
2
classificatio n s a n d in [the city of St. Louis] any city not
3
within a county, it is the duty of the county [commission,
4
or, where there is no county commission, such other
5
authorized] governing body, to provide a place of juvenile
6
detention [for children coming within the provisions of this
7
chapter] or juvenile detention facility. It is also the
8
duty of the county [commission or other a uthorized]
9
governing body to provide offices for the personnel of the
10
juvenile court.
11
2. The place of juvenile detention or juvenile
12
detenti o n facility shall be so located and arranged that the
13
child being detained does not come in contact, at any time
14
or in any manner, with adults convicted or under arrest, and
15
the care of children in detention shall approximate as
16
closely as possible the care of children in good homes.
17
3. The place of juvenile detention or juvenile
18
detenti o n facility shall be in charge of a superintendent.
19
The judge of the juvenile court or the family court
20
administrator, if provided by local rule, shall appoint and
21
fix the compensation and maintenance of the superintendent
22
and of any assistants or other personnel required to operate
23
the detention facility. Such compensation and maintenance
24
are payable out of fund s of the county.
25
4. The county [commission or other] governing body [of
26
the cou n ty] is authorized to lease or to acquire by
27
purchase, gift or devise land for such purpose, and to erect
28
buildings thereon and to provide funds to equip and maintain
29
the same for the subsistence and education of the children
30
placed therein.
1
211.341. 1. [Counties of the third and fourth classes
2
within one ju d ici a l circuit, shall,] Upon the written

SS#3 SB 888 19
3
recommendation of the [circuit] presiding judge of that
4
judicial circuit, or upon written notice from the county
5
governing body to the presiding judge of approval of
6
ordinances, orders, or resolutions authorizing a juvenile
7
detention facility by all counties within that judicial
8
circuit and the agreement provided in section 211.342,
9
counties of the third and fourth classes within one judicial
10
circuit shall establish a place of juvenile detention or
11
juvenile detention facility to serve all of the counties
12
within that judicial circuit, and in like manner, the
13
counties shall supply offices for the juvenile officers of
14
that circuit.
15
2. The r e c ommendation of the [circuit] presiding judge
16
provide d in subsection 1 of this section shall be made only
17
after a hearing conducted by [him] the judge, after thirty
18
days' notice, to determine the need and feasibility of
19
establishing such a place of juvenile detention or juvenile
20
detention facility within the judicial circuit.
21
3. The provisions of section 211.331 apply as to the
22
form of operation and means of maintenance of the place of
23
juvenile detention or juvenile detention facility, except
24
that the total cost of establishment and operation of the
25
places of juvenile detention or juvenile detention
26
facilities shall be prorated among the several counties
27
within that judicial circuit upon a ratio to be determined
28
by a comparison of the respective populations of the
29
counties. The point of location of the place of juvenile
30
detention or juvenile detention facility shall be determined
31
by the [circuit] presiding judge of the judicial circuit or
32
pursuant to an agreement established by section 211.342.
33
[2. Circuit judges of any two or more adjoining
34
judicial circuits after a hearing as provided in subsection

SS#3 SB 888 20
35
1 may, by agreement confirmed by judicial order, and] 4. In
36
the interest of economy of administration, after a heari n g
37
as provided in subsection 2 of this section, the presiding
38
judges of any two or more adjoining judicial circuit may
39
establish one place of juvenile detention or juvenile
40
detention facility to serve their respective judicial
41
circuits, by agreement confirmed by judicial order. In such
42
event, the [circuit] presiding judges so agreeing sh all
43
jointly govern the affairs of the place of juvenile
44
detention or juvenile detention facility and the cost
45
thereof shall be apportioned among the counties served in
46
the manner provided for in subsection 1 of this section.
47
[3.] 5. Any county of the third or fourth class
48
desiring to p rovide its own place of juvenile detention or
49
juvenile detention facility may do so in the manner
50
prescribed for counties of the first and second classes.
1
211.342. 1. (1) In coordination with each other, the
2
governing bod i es o f th e counties within the same judicial
3
circuit may establish a juvenile detention facility to serve
4
the judicial circuit.
5
(2) The governing body of each county desiring to
6
coordina t e a juvenile detention facility under this
7
subsection shall approve an ordinance, order, or resolution
8
authorizing a juvenile detention facility within one of the
9
counties and shall approve an agreement between all counties
10
within the same judicial circuit, as specified by subsection
11
4 of this section.
12
2. (1) In coordination with each other, the governing
13
bodies o f th e counties in adjoining judicial circuits may
14
establish a juvenile detention facility to serve the
15
judicial circuits.

SS#3 SB 888 21
16
(2) The governing body of each county desiring to
17
coordina t e a juvenile detention facility under this
18
subsection shall approve an ordinance, order, or resolution
19
authorizing a juvenile detention facility within one of the
20
counties and shall approve an agreement between all counties
21
within each judicial circuit, as specified by subsection 4
22
of this section.
23
3. The governing body of each county desiring to
24
coordin a te a juvenile detention facility under subsection 1
25
or 2 of this section shall notify the presiding judge of the
26
judicial circuit or each judicial circuit of the
27
authorization of a juvenile detention facility. The notice
28
shall include the authorizing ordinance, order, or
29
resolution of each county and the approved agreement, as
30
specified in subsection 4 of this section.
31
4. The agreement that specifies the duties of each
32
county s hall contain the following:
33
(1) The total cost of establishment and operation of
34
the plac e s of detention;
35
(2) The prorated formula for the calculation of each
36
county's contribution to the costs of a juvenile detention
37
facility based upon a ratio of the respective populations of
38
the counties;
39
(3) The methods and powers that may be used for
40
construc t ing, leasing, or financing a juvenile detention
41
facility;
42
(4) The use of the sales tax as authorized by
43
subsecti o n 6 of this section; and
44
(5) The point of location of the place of juvenile
45
detentio n facility.
46
5. Subsection 3 and 4 of section 211.331 shall apply
47
to a ju v enile detention facility authorized pursuant to this

SS#3 SB 888 22
48
section. The operation and support of a juvenile detention
49
facility authorized pursuant to this section shall be
50
regulated in accordance with the rules and standards of the
51
Missouri supreme court under the governance of the presiding
52
judge of the judicial circuit. If the counties of adjoining
53
judicial circuits have authori z ed a juvenile detention
54
facility pursuant to this section, the presiding judges
55
shall jointly govern the affairs of the juvenile detention
56
facility.
57
6. (1) The counties authorizing a juvenile detention
58
facilit y pur s uant to this section may impose, by order, a
59
sales tax up to one percent on all retail sales made in such
60
counties which are subject to taxation pursuant to the
61
provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of
62
providing a juvenile detention facility. The tax authorized
63
by this section shall be in addition to a ny and all other
64
sales taxes allowed by law, except that no order imposing a
65
sales tax pursuant to this section shall be effective unless
66
the governing body, for each county in the judicial circuit
67
or circuits submits to the voters of the county, on any
68
election date authorized in chapter 115, a proposal to
69
authorize the governing body of the county to impose a tax.
70
(2) The ballot of submission shall contain, but need
71
not be l i mited to, the following language:
72
Shall the (counties' names) impose a region-wide
73
sales tax of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose
74
of providing a juvenile detention facility within in
75
the jurisdiction of (judicial circuit's name or
76
judicial circuits' name)?
77
□ YES □ NO

SS#3 SB 888 23
78
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in
79
the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the
80
question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
81
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
82
qualified voters of the county voting thereon are in favor
83
of the proposal, then the order and any amendment to such
84
order shall be in effect on the first day of the second
85
quarter immediately following the election approving the
86
proposal. If the proposal receives less than the required
87
majority, the governing body of the county shall have no
88
power to impose the sales tax authorized pursuant to this
89
section unless and until the governing body of the county
90
shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the
91
county commission, or authorized body, to impose the sales
92
tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved
93
by the required majority of the qualified voters of the
94
county commission, or authorized body, voting on such
95
proposal; however, in no event shall a proposal pursuant to
96
this section be submitted to the voters sooner than twelve
97
months from the date of the last submission of a proposal
98
pursuant to this section.
99
(3) All revenue received by a county from the tax
100
authoriz e d pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a
101
special trust fund and shall be used solely for providing a
102
juvenile detention facility for children coming within the
103
provisions of this chapter for so long as the tax shall
104
remain in effect.
105
(4) Once the tax authorized by this section is
106
abolishe d or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in
107
the special trust fund shall be used solely for providing a

SS#3 SB 888 24
108
juvenile detention facility for children coming within the
109
provisions of this chapter for the counties. Any funds in
110
such special trust fund which are not needed for current
111
expenditures may be invested by the county commission in
112
accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment
113
of other county funds.
114
(5) All sales taxes collected by the director of
115
revenue p ursuant to this section on behalf of any county,
116
less one percent for cost of collection which shall be
117
deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment
118
of premiums for surety bonds as provided in section 32.087,
119
shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby
120
created, to be known as the "Juvenile Detention Facility
121
Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the juvenile detention
122
facility sales tax trus t fund shall not be deemed to be
123
state funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of
124
the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate
125
records of the amount of money in the trust fund which was
126
collected in each county imposing a sales tax pursuant to
127
this section, and the records shall be open to the
128
inspection of officers of each member county and the
129
public. Not later than the tenth day of each month the
130
directo r of revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in
131
the trust fund during the preceding month to the county
132
which levied the tax. Such funds shall be deposited with
133
the treasurer of each such county, and all expenditures of
134
funds arising from the juvenile detention facility sales tax
135
trust fund shall be paid pursuant to an appropriation
136
adopted by the governing body of the county. Expenditures
137
may be made from the fund for the function a u thorized in the
138
order adopted by the governing body of the county submitting
139
the juvenile detention facility tax to the voters.

SS#3 SB 888 25
140
(6) The director of revenue may make refunds from the
141
amounts i n the trust fund and credited to any county for
142
erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem
143
dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such
144
counties. If any county abolishes the tax, the governing
145
body of th e county shall notify the director of revenue of
146
the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date
147
of the repeal, and the director of revenue may order
148
retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of
149
two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such
150
notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the tax
151
and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the
152
credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after
153
the effective date of abo lition of the tax in such county,
154
the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the
155
account to the county and close the account of that county.
156
The director of revenue shall notify each county in each
157
instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from
158
receipts due the county.
159
(7) Except as provided in this section, all provisions
160
of secti o ns 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed
161
pursuant to this section.
1
211.436. 1. Instruments of restraint, including
2
handcuffs, ch a ins , irons, or straitjackets, shall not be
3
used on a child during a proceeding in a juvenile court and
4
shall be removed prior to the child's appearance before the
5
court unless, after a hearing, the court finds both that:
6
(1) The use of restraints is necessary due to one of
7
the foll o wing factors:
8
(a) Instruments of restraint are necessary to prevent
9
physical harm to the child or another person;

SS#3 SB 888 26
10
(b) The child has a history of disruptive courtroom
11
behavior that has placed others in potentially harmful
12
situations or presents a substantial risk of inflicting
13
physical harm on himself or herself or others as evidenced
14
by recent behavior; or
15
(c) There is evidence that the child presents a
16
substant i al risk of flight from the courtroom; and
17
(2) There are no less restrictive alternatives to
18
restrain t s that will prevent flight or physical harm to the
19
child or another person including, but not limited to, the
20
presence of court personnel, law enforcement officers, or
21
bailiffs.
22
2. If the juvenile officer believes that there is an
23
immedia t e safety or flight risk, as provided under
24
subsection 1 of this section, the juvenile officer shall
25
advise the attorney for the child and make a request in
26
writing prior to the commencement of the proceeding for the
27
child to remain restrained during the court proceeding while
28
in the presence of the parties to the proceeding.
29
3. If a request for restraints is made by the juvenile
30
officer , the court shall order a hearing and provide the
31
child's attorney an opportunity to be heard before the court
32
orders the use of restraints. If restraints are ordered,
33
the court shall make findings of fact in support of the
34
order.
35
4. If restraints are used, the restraints shall allow
36
the chi l d limited movement of the hands to read and handle
37
documents and writings necessary to the proceeding. Under
38
no circumstances shall a child be restrained using
39
restraints fixed to a wall, floor, furniture, or other
40
stationary object.

SS#3 SB 888 27
41
5. Leg restraints shall not be used on a child unless
42
the chi l d is charged with a class A or class B felony, or
43
the official overseeing custody of the child determines the
44
child to be an immediate safety or flight risk.
1
217.362. 1. The department of corrections shall
2
design and im p lem e nt an intensive long-term program for the
3
treatment of chronic nonviolent offenders with serious
4
substance abuse addictions who have not [pleaded] pled
5
guilty to or been convicted of a dangerous felony as defined
6
in section 556.061.
7
2. Prior to sentencing, any judge considering an
8
offende r for this program shall notify the department. The
9
potential candidate for the program shall be screened b y the
10
department to determine eligibility. The department shall,
11
by regulation, establish eligibility criteria and inform the
12
court of such criteria. The department shall notify the
13
court as to the offende r 's eligibility and the availability
14
of space in the program. Notwithstanding any other
15
provision of law to the c ontrary, except as provided for in
16
section 558.019, if an offender is eligible and there is
17
adequate space, the court may sentence a person to the
18
program which shall consist of institutional drug or alcohol
19
treatment for a period of at least twelve and no more than
20
twenty-four months, as well as a term of incarceration. The
21
department shall determine the nature, intensity, durat i on,
22
and completion criteria of the education, treatment, and
23
aftercare portions of any program services provided.
24
Execution of the offender's term of incarceration sh a ll be
25
suspended pending completion of said program. Allocation of
26
space in the program may be distributed by th e department in
27
proportion to drug arrest patterns in the state. If the
28
court is advised that an offender is not eligibl e or that

SS#3 SB 888 28
29
there is no space available, the court shall consider other
30
authorized dispositions.
31
3. Upon successful completion of the program, the
32
divisio n of probation and parole shall advise the sentencing
33
court of an offender's probationary release date thirty days
34
prior to release. If the court determines that probation is
35
not appropriate th e court may order the execution of the
36
offender's sentence.
37
4. If it is determined by the department that the
38
offende r has not successfully completed the program, or that
39
the offender is not cooperatively participating in the
40
program, the offender shall be removed from the program and
41
the court shall be advised. Failure of an offender to
42
complete the program shall c ause the offender to serve the
43
sentence prescribed by the court and void the right to be
44
considered for probation on this sentence.
45
[5. An offender's first incarceration in a department
46
of corre c tions program pursuant to this section prior to
47
release on probation shall not be considered a previous
48
prison commitment for the purpose of determining a minimum
49
prison term pursuant to the provisions of section 558.019.]
1
217.690. 1. All releases or paroles shall issue upon
2
order of the p aro l e board, duly adopted.
3
2. Before ordering the parole of any offender, the
4
parole b oard shall conduct a validated risk and needs
5
assessment and evaluate the case under the rules governing
6
parole that are promulgated by the parole board. The parole
7
board shall then have the offender appear before a hearing
8
panel and shall conduct a personal interview with him or
9
her, unless waived by the offender, or if the guidelines
10
indicate the offender may be paroled without need for an
11
interview. The guidelines and rules shall not allow for the

SS#3 SB 888 29
12
waiver of a hearing if a victim requests a hearing. The
13
appearance or presence may occur by means of a
14
videoconference at the discretion of the parole board. A
15
parole may be ordered for the best interest of society when
16
there is a reasonable probability, based on the risk
17
assessment and indicators of release readiness, that the
18
person can be supervised under parole supervision and
19
successfully reintegrated into the community, not as an
20
award of clemency; it shall not be considered a reduction of
21
sentence or a pardon. Every offender while on parole shall
22
remain in the legal cu stody of the department but shall be
23
subject to the orders of the parole board.
24
3. The division of probation and parole has
25
discret i onary authority to require the payment of a fee, not
26
to exceed sixty dollars per month, from every offender
27
placed under division supervision on probation, parole, or
28
conditional release, to waive all or part of any fee, to
29
sanction offenders for willful nonpayment of fees, and to
30
contract with a private entity for fee collections
31
services. All fees collected shall be deposited in the
32
inmate fu n d established in section 217.430. Fees collected
33
may be used to pay the costs of contracted c ollections
34
services. The fees collected may otherwise be used to
35
provide c o mmunity corrections and intervention services for
36
offenders. Such services include substance abuse assessment
37
and treatm e nt, mental health assessment and treatment,
38
electronic monitoring services, residential facilities
39
services, employment placement services, and other offender
40
community corrections or intervention services designated by
41
the division of probation and parole to assist offenders to
42
successfully complete probation, parole, or conditional
43
release. The division of probation and parole shall adopt

SS#3 SB 888 30
44
rules not inconsistent with law, in accordance with section
45
217.040, with respect to sanctioning offenders and with
46
respect to establishing, waiving, collecting, and using fees.
47
4. The parole board shall adopt rules not inconsistent
48
with la w , in accordance with section 217.040, with respect
49
to the eligibility of offenders for parole, the conduct of
50
parole hearings or conditions to be imposed upon paroled
51
offenders. Whenever an order for parole is issued it shall
52
recite the conditions of such parole.
53
5. When considering parole for an offender with
54
consecu t ive sentences, the minimum term for eligibility for
55
parole shall be calculated by adding the minimum terms for
56
parole eligibility for each of the consecutive sentences,
57
except the minimum term for parole eligibility shall not
58
exceed the minimum term for parole eligibility for an
59
ordinary life sentence.
60
6. Any offender sentenced to a term of imprisonment
61
amounti n g to fifteen years or more or multiple terms of
62
imprisonment that, taken together, amount to fifteen or more
63
years who was under eighteen years of age at the time of the
64
commission of the offense or offenses may be eligible for
65
parole after serving fifteen years of incarceration,
66
regardless of whether the case is final for the purposes of
67
appeal, and may be eligible for reconsideration hearings in
68
accordance with regulations promulgated by the parole board.
69
7. The provisions of subsection 6 of this section
70
shall n o t apply to an offender found guilty of capital
71
murder, murder in the first degree or murder in the second
72
degree, when murder in the second degree is committed
73
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section
74
565.021, who was under eighteen years of age when the
75
offender committed the offense or offenses who may be found

SS#3 SB 888 31
76
ineligible for parole or whose parole eligibility may be
77
controlled by section 558.047 or 565.033.
78
8. Any offender under a sentence for first degree
79
murder w ho has been denied release on parole after a parole
80
hearing shall not be eligible for another parole hearing
81
until at least three years from the month of the parole
82
denial; however, this subsection shall not prevent a release
83
pursuant to subsection [4] 7 of section 558.011.
84
9. A victim who has requested an opportunity to be
85
heard s h all receive notice that the parole board is
86
conducting an assessment of the offender's risk and
87
readiness for release and that the victim's input will be
88
particularly helpful when it pertains to safety concerns and
89
specific protective measures that may be beneficial to the
90
victim should the offender be granted release.
91
10. Parole hearings shall, at a minimum, contain the
92
followin g procedures:
93
(1) The victim or person representing the victim who
94
attends a hearing may be accompanied by one other person;
95
(2) The victim or person representing the victim who
96
attends a hearing shall have the option of giving testimony
97
in the presence of the inmate or to the hearing panel
98
without the inmate being present;
99
(3) The victim or person representing the victim may
100
call or w rite the parole board rather than attend the
101
hearing;
102
(4) The victim or person representing the victim may
103
have a p e rsonal meeting with a parole board member at the
104
parole board's central office;
105
(5) The judge, prosecuting attorney or circuit
106
attorney and a representative of the local law enforcement
107
agency investigating the crime shall be allowed to attend

SS#3 SB 888 32
108
the hearing or provide information to the hearing panel in
109
regard to the parole consideration; and
110
(6) The parole board shall evaluate information listed
111
in the j u venile sex offender registry pursuant to section
112
211.425, provided the offender is between the ages of
113
seventeen and twenty-one, as it impacts the safety of the
114
community.
115
11. The parole board shall notify any person of the
116
results o f a parole eligibility hearing if the person
117
indicates to the parole board a desire to be notified.
118
12. The parole board may, at its discretion, require
119
any offe n der seeking parole to meet certain conditions
120
during the term of that parole so long as said conditions
121
are not illegal or impossible for the offender to perform.
122
These conditions may include an amount of restitution to t h e
123
state for the cost of that offender's incarceration.
124
13. Special parole conditions shall be responsive to
125
the asse s sed risk and needs of the offender or the need for
126
extraordinary supervision, such as electronic monitoring.
127
The parole board shall adopt rules to minimize the
128
conditions placed on low-risk cases, to frontload conditions
129
upon release, and to require the modification and reduction
130
of conditions based on the person's continuing stability in
131
the community. Parole board rules shall permit parole
132
conditions to b e modified by parole officers with review and
133
approval by supervisors.
134
14. Nothing contained in this section shall be
135
construe d to require the release of an offender on parole
136
nor to reduce the sentence of an offender heretofore
137
committed.
138
15. Beginning January 1, 2001, the parole board shall
139
not orde r a parole unless the offender has obtained a high

SS#3 SB 888 33
140
school diploma or its equivalent, or unless the parole board
141
is satisfied that the offender, while committed to the
142
custody of the department, has made an honest good-faith
143
effort to obtain a high school diploma or its equivalent;
144
provided that the director may waive this requirement by
145
certifying in writing to the parole board that the offender
146
has actively participated in mandatory education programs or
147
is academically unable to obtain a high school diploma or
148
its equivalent.
149
16. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
150
defined i n section 536.010, that is created under the
151
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
152
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
153
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
154
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
155
if any o f the powers vested with the general assembly
156
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
157
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
158
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
159
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
160
2005, shall be invalid and void.
161
17. When concurrent sentences are imposed by a court,
162
the pers o n shall serve the minimum required percentage for
163
the longest sentence prior to parole eligibility.
1
217.760. 1. In all felony cases and class A
2
misdemeanor c a ses , the basis of which misdemeanor cases are
3
contained in chapters 565 and 566 and section 577.023, at
4
the request of a [circuit] sentencing judge of any circuit
5
court, the division of probation and parole shall assign one
6
or more state probation and parole officers to make an
7
investigation of the person convicted of the crime or
8
offense before sentence is imposed. In all felony cases in

SS#3 SB 888 34
9
which the recommended sentence established by the sentencing
10
advisory commission pursuant to subsection [7] 1 of section
11
558.019 includes probation but the recommendation of the
12
prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney does not include
13
probation, the division of probation and parole shall, prior
14
to sentencing, provide the judge with a report on available
15
alternatives to incarceration. If a presentence
16
investigation report is comple t ed then the available
17
alternatives shall be included in the presentence
18
investigation report.
19
2. The report of the presentence investigation or
20
preparo l e investigation shall contain any prior criminal
21
record of the defendant and such information about his or
22
her characteristics, his or her financial condition, his or
23
her social history, the circumstances affecting his or her
24
behavior as may be helpful in imposing sentence or in
25
granting probation or in the correctional treatment of the
26
defendant, information concerning the impact of the crime
27
upon the victim, the recommended sentence established by the
28
sentencing advisory commission and available alternatives to
29
incarceration including opportunities for restorative
30
justice, as well as a recommendation by the probation and
31
parole officer. The officer shall secure such other
32
information as m ay be required by the court and, whenever it
33
is practicable and needed, such investigation shall include
34
a physical and mental examination of the defendant.
1
556.061. In this code, unless the context requires a
2
different def i nition, the following terms shall mean:
3
(1) "Access", to instruct, communicate with, store
4
data in, retrieve or extract data from, or otherwise make
5
any use of any resources of, a computer, computer system, or
6
computer network;

SS#3 SB 888 35
7
(2) "Affirmative defense":
8
(a) The defense referred to is not submitted to the
9
trier of fact unless supported by evidence; and
10
(b) If the defense is submitted to the trier of fact
11
the defe n dant has the burden of persuasion that the defense
12
is more probably true than not;
13
(3) "Burden of injecting the issue":
14
(a) The issue referred to is not submitted to the
15
trier of fact unless supported by evidence; and
16
(b) If the issue is submitted to the trier of fact any
17
reasonab l e doubt on the issue requires a finding for the
18
defendant on that issue;
19
(4) "Commercial film and photographic print
20
processo r ", any person who develops exposed photographic
21
film into negatives, slides or prints, or who makes prints
22
from negatives or slides, for compensation. The term
23
commercial film and photographic print proc e ssor shall
24
include all employees of such persons but shall not include
25
a person who develops film or makes prints for a public
26
agency;
27
(5) "Computer", the box that houses the central
28
processi n g unit (CPU), along with any internal storage
29
devices, such as internal hard drives, and internal
30
communication devices, such as internal modems capable of
31
sending or receiving [electronic mail] email or fax cards,
32
along with any other hardware stored or housed internally.
33
Thus, computer refers to hardware, software and data
34
contained in the main unit. Printers, external modems
35
attached by cable to the ma i n unit, monitors, and other
36
external attachments will be referred to collectively as
37
peripherals and discussed individually when appropriate.
38
When the computer and all peripherals are referred to as a

SS#3 SB 888 36
39
package, the term "computer system" is used. Information
40
refers to all the information on a computer s ystem including
41
both software applications and data;
42
(6) "Computer equipment", computers, terminals, data
43
storage d evices, and all other computer hardware associated
44
with a computer system or network;
45
(7) "Computer hardware", all equipment which can
46
collect, analyze, create, display, convert, store, conceal
47
or transmit electronic, magnetic, optical or similar
48
computer impulses or data. Hardware includes, but is not
49
limited to, any data proce s sing devices, such as central
50
processing units, memory typewriters and self-contained
51
laptop or notebook computers; internal and peripheral
52
storage devices, transistor-like binary devices and other
53
memory storage devices, such as floppy disks, removable
54
disks, compact disks, digital video disks, magnetic tape,
55
hard drive, optical disks and digital memory; local area
56
networks, such as two or more computers connected together
57
to a central computer server via cable or modem; peripheral
58
input or output devices, such as keyboards, printers,
59
scanners, plotters, video display monitors and optical
60
readers; and related communication devices, such as modems,
61
cables and connections, recording equipment, RAM or ROM
62
units, acoustic couplers, automatic dialers, speed dialers,
63
programmable telephone dialing or signaling devices and
64
electronic tone-generating devices; as well as any devices,
65
mechanisms or parts that can be used to restrict access to
66
computer hardware, such as physical keys and locks;
67
(8) "Computer network", two or more interconnected
68
computer s or computer systems;

SS#3 SB 888 37
69
(9) "Computer program", a set of instructions,
70
statemen t s, or related data that directs or is intended to
71
direct a computer to perform certain functions;
72
(10) "Computer software", digital information which
73
can be in t erpreted by a computer and any of its related
74
components to direct the way they work. Software is stored
75
in electronic, magnetic, optical or othe r digital form. The
76
term commonly includes programs to run operating system s and
77
applications, such as word processing, graphic, or
78
spreadsheet programs, utilities, compilers, interpreters and
79
communications programs;
80
(11) "Computer-related documentation", written,
81
recorded, printed or electronically stored material which
82
explains or illustrates how to configure or use computer
83
hardware, software or other related items;
84
(12) "Computer system", a set of related, connected or
85
unconnect e d, computer equipment, data, or software;
86
(13) "Confinement":
87
(a) A person is in confinement when such person is
88
held in a place of confinement pursuant to arrest or order
89
of a court, and remains in confinement until:
90
a. A court orders the person's release; or
91
b. The person is released on bail, bond, or
92
recogni z ance, personal or otherwise; or
93
c. A public servant having the legal power and duty to
94
confine the person authorizes his release without guard and
95
without condition that he return to confinement;
96
(b) A person is not in confinement if:
97
a. T he person is on probation or parole, temporary or
98
otherwi s e; or
99
b. The person is under sentence to serve a term of
100
confine m ent which is not continuous, or is serving a

SS#3 SB 888 38
101
sentence under a work-release program, and in either such
102
case is not being held in a place of confinement or is not
103
being held under guard by a person having the legal power
104
and duty to transport the person to or from a place of
105
confinement;
106
(14) "Consent": consent or lack of consent may be
107
expressed or implied. Assent does not constitute consent if:
108
(a) It is given b y a person who lacks the mental
109
capacity to authorize the conduct charged to constitute the
110
offense and such mental incapacity is manifest or known to
111
the actor; or
112
(b) It is given by a person who by reason of youth,
113
mental d i sease or defect, intoxication, a drug-induced
114
state, or any other reason is manifestly unable or known by
115
the actor to be unable to make a reasonable judgment as to
116
the nature or harmfulness of the conduct charged to
117
constitute the offense; or
118
(c) It is induced by force, duress or deception;
119
(15 ) "Controlled substance", a drug, substance, or
120
immediate precursor in Schedules I through V as defined in
121
chapter 195;
122
(16) "Criminal negligence", failure to be aware of a
123
substanti a l and unjustifiable risk that circumstances exist
124
or a result will follow, and such failure constitutes a
125
gross deviation from the standard of care which a reasonable
126
person would exercise in the situation;
127
(17) "Custody", a person is in custody when he or she
128
has been a rrested but has not been delivered to a place of
129
confinement;
130
(18) "Damage", when used in relation to a computer
131
system or network, means any alteration, deletion, or
132
destruction of any part of the computer system or network;

SS#3 SB 888 39
133
(19) "Dangerous felony", the felonies [of] requiring
134
eighty-fi v e percent of the imposed sentence to be served
135
prior to parole eligibility, which are arson in the first
136
degree, assault in the first degree, attempted rape in the
137
first degree if physical injury results, attempted forcible
138
rape if physical injury results, attempted sodomy in the
139
first degree if physical injury results, attempted forcible
140
sodomy if physical injury results, rape in the first degree,
141
forcible rape, sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy,
142
assault in the second degree if the victim of such assault
143
is a special victim as defined in subdivision (14) of
144
section 565.002, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping,
145
murder in the second degree, assault of a law enforcement
146
officer in the first degree, domestic assault in the first
147
degree, elder abuse in the first degree, robbery in the
148
first degree, armed criminal action, conspiracy to commit an
149
offense when the offense is a dangerous felony, vehicle
150
hijacking when punished as a class A felony, statutory rape
151
in the first degree [when the victim is a child less than
152
twelve years of age at the time of the commission of the act
153
giving rise to the offense], statutory sodomy in the first
154
degree [when the victim is a child less than twelve years of
155
age at the time of the commission of the act giving rise to
156
the offense], child molestation in the first or second
157
degree, abuse of a child if the child dies as a result of
158
injuries sustained from conduct chargeable under section
159
568.060, child kidnapping, parental kidnapping committed by
160
detaining or concealing the whereabouts of the child for not
161
less than one hundred twenty days under section 565.153, bus
162
hijacking when punished as a class A felony, planting a bomb
163
or explosive in or near a bus or terminal, [and] an
164
"intoxication-related traffic offense" or "intoxication-

SS#3 SB 888 40
165
related boating offense" if the person is found to be a
166
"habitual offender" or "habitual boating offender" as such
167
terms are defined in section 577.001, abuse through forced
168
labor when punished under subsection 4 of section 566.203,
169
trafficking for the purposes of slavery, involuntary
170
servitude, peonage, or forced labor or the attempt of such
171
when punished under subsection 4 of section 566.206,
172
trafficking for the purposes of sexual exploitation or the
173
attempt of such when the offense was effected by force,
174
abduction, or coercion, sexual trafficking of a child in the
175
first degree, sexual trafficking of a child in the second
176
degree, a third violation of failure to register as a sexual
177
offender, and endangering the welfare of a child in the
178
first degree when punished under section 568.045;
179
(20) "Dangerous instrument", any instrument, article
180
or substa n ce, which, under the circumstances in which it is
181
used, is readily capable of causing death or other serious
182
physical injury;
183
(21) "Data", a representation of information, facts,
184
knowledge , concepts, or instructions prepared in a
185
formalized or other manner and intended for use in a
186
computer or computer network. Data may be in any form
187
including, but not limited to , printouts, microfiche,
188
magnetic storage media, punched cards and as may be stored
189
in the memory of a computer;
190
(22) "Deadly weapon", any firearm, loaded or unloaded,
191
or any we a pon from which a shot, readily capable of
192
producing death or serious physical injury, may be
193
discharged, or a switchblade knife, dagger, billy club,
194
blackjack or metal knuckles;

SS#3 SB 888 41
195
(23) "Digital camera", a camera that records images in
196
a format w hich enables the images to be downloaded into a
197
computer;
198
(24) "Disability", a mental, physical, or
199
developme n tal impairment that substantially limits one or
200
more major life activities or the ability to provide
201
adequately for one's care or protection, whether the
202
impairment is congenital or acquired by accident, injury or
203
disease, where such impairment is verified by medical
204
findings;
205
(25) "Elderly person", a person sixty years of age or
206
older;
207
(26) "Felony", an offense so designated or an offense
208
for which persons found guilty thereof may be sentenced to
209
death or imprisonment for a term of more than one year;
210
(27) "Forcible compulsion" either:
211
(a) P hysical force that overcomes reasonable
212
resistan c e; or
213
(b) A threat, express or implied, that places a person
214
in reaso n able fear of death, serious physical injury or
215
kidnapping of such person or another person;
216
(28) "Incapacitated", a temporary or permanent
217
physical o r mental condition in which a person is
218
unconscious, unable to appraise the nature of his or her
219
conduct, or unable to communicate unwillingness to an act;
220
(29) "Infraction", a violation defined by this code or
221
by any ot h er statute of this state if it is so designated or
222
if no sentence other than a fine, or fine and forfeiture or
223
other civil penalty, is authorized upon conviction;
224
(30) "Inhabitable structure", a vehicle, vessel or
225
structure :

SS#3 SB 888 42
226
(a) Where any person lives or carries on business or
227
other ca l ling; or
228
(b) Where people assemble for purposes of business,
229
governme n t, education, religion, entertainment, or public
230
transportation; or
231
(c) Which is used for overnight accommodation of
232
persons.
233
Any such vehicle, vessel, or structure is inhabitable
234
regardless of whether a person is actually present. If a
235
building or structure is divided into separately oc c upied
236
units, any unit not occupied by the actor is an inhabitable
237
structure of another;
238
(31) "Knowingly", when used with respect to:
239
(a) C onduct or attendant circumstances, means a person
240
is aware of the nature of his or her conduct or that those
241
circumstances exist; or
242
(b) A result of conduct, means a person is aware that
243
his or h e r conduct is practically certain to cause that
244
result;
245
(32) "Law enforcement officer", any public servant
246
having bo t h the power and duty to make arrests for
247
violations of the laws of this state, and federal law
248
enforcement officers authorized to carry firearms and to
249
make arrests for violations of the laws of the United States;
250
(33) "Misdemeanor", an offense so designated or an
251
offense f o r which persons found guilty thereof may be
252
sentenced to imprisonment for a term of which the maximum is
253
one year or less;
254
(34) "Of another", property that any entity, including
255
but not l i mited to any natural person, corporation, limited
256
liability company, partnership, association, governmental

SS#3 SB 888 43
257
subdivision or instrumentality, other than the actor, has a
258
possessory or proprietary interest therein, except that
259
property shall not be deemed property of another who has
260
only a security interest therein, even if legal title is in
261
the creditor pursuant to a conditional sales contract or
262
other security arrangement;
263
(35) "Offense", any felony or misdemeanor;
264
(36) "Physical injury", slight impairment of any
265
function o f the body or temporary loss of use of any part of
266
the body;
267
(37) "Place of confinement", any building or facility
268
and the g r ounds thereof wherein a court is legally
269
authorized to order that a person charged with or convicted
270
of a crime be held;
271
(38) "Possess" or "possessed", having actual or
272
construct i ve possession of an object with knowledge of its
273
presence. A person has actual possession if such person has
274
the objec t on his or her person or within easy reach and
275
convenient control. A person has constructive possession if
276
such person has the power and the intention at a given time
277
to exercise dominion or control over the object either
278
directly or through another person or persons. Possession
279
may also be sole or joint. If one person alone has
280
possession of an object, p o ssession is sole. If two or more
281
persons share possession of an object, posses sion is joint;
282
(39) "Property", anything of value, whether real or
283
personal, tangible or intangible, in possession or in action;
284
(40) "Public servant", any person employed in any way
285
by a gove r nment of this state who is compensated by the
286
government by reason of such person's employment, any person
287
appointed to a position with any government of this state,
288
or any person elected to a position with any government of

SS#3 SB 888 44
289
this state. It includes, but is not limited to,
290
legislators , jurors, members of the judiciary and law
291
enforcement officers. It does not include witnesses;
292
(41) "Purposely" , when used with respect to a person's
293
conduct o r to a result thereof, means when it is his or her
294
conscious object to engage in that conduct or to cause that
295
result;
296
(42) "Recklessly", consciously disregarding a
297
substanti a l and unjustifiable risk that circumstances exist
298
or that a result will follow, and such disregard constitutes
299
a gross deviation from the standard of care which a
300
reasonable person would exercise in the situation;
301
(43) "Serious emotional injury", an injury that
302
creates a substantial risk of temporary or permanent medical
303
or psychological damage, manifested by impairment of a
304
behavioral, cognitive or physical condition. Serious
305
emotional injury shall be established by test imony of
306
qualified experts upon the reasonable expectation of
307
probable harm to a reasonable degree of medical or
308
psychological certainty;
309
(44) "Serious physical injury", physical injury that
310
creates a substantial risk of death or that causes serious
311
disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the
312
function of any part of the body;
313
(45) "Services", when used in relation to a computer
314
system or network, means use of a computer, computer system,
315
or computer network and includes, but is not limited to,
316
computer time, data processing, and storage or retrieval
317
functions;
318
(46) "Sexual orientation", male or female
319
heterosex u ality, homosexuality or bisexuality by
320
inclination, practice, identity or expression, or having a

SS#3 SB 888 45
321
self-image or identity not traditionally associated with
322
one's gender;
323
(47) "Vehicle", a self-propelled mechanical device
324
designed t o carry a person or persons, excluding vessels or
325
aircraft;
326
(48) "Vessel", any boat or craft propelled by a motor
327
or by mac h inery, whether or not such motor or machinery is a
328
principal source of propulsion used or capable of being used
329
as a means of transportation on water, or any boat or craft
330
more than twelve feet in length which is powered by sail
331
alone or by a combination of sail and machinery, and used or
332
capable of being used as a means of transportation on water,
333
but not any boat or craft having, as the only means of
334
propulsion, a paddle or oars;
335
(49) "Voluntary act":
336
(a) A bodily movement performed while conscious as a
337
result o f effort or determination. Possession is a
338
voluntary act if the possessor kno w ingly procures or
339
receives the thing possessed, or having acquired control of
340
it was aware of his or her control for a sufficient time to
341
have enabled him or her to dispose of it or terminate his or
342
her control; or
343
(b) An omission to perform an act of which the actor
344
is physi c ally capable. A person is not guilty of an offense
345
based solely upon an o m ission to perform an act unless the
346
law defining the offense expressly so provides, or a duty to
347
perform the omitted act is otherwise imposed by law;
348
(50) "Vulnerable person", any person in the custody,
349
care, or c ontrol of the department of mental health who is
350
receiving services from an operated, funded, licensed, or
351
certified program.

SS#3 SB 888 46
1
557.011. 1. Every person found guilty of an offense
2
shall be deal t wi t h by the court in accordance with the
3
provisions of this chapter, except that for offenses defined
4
outside this code and not repealed, the term of imprisonment
5
or the fine that may be imposed is that provided in the
6
statute defining the offense; however, the conditional
7
release term of any sentence of a term of years shall be
8
determined as provided in subsection [4] 7 of section
9
558.011.
10
2. Whenever any person has been found guilty of a
11
felony o r a misdemeanor the court shall make one or more of
12
the following dispositions of the offender in any
13
appropriate combination. The court may:
14
(1) Sentence the pe r son to a term of imprisonment as
15
authoriz e d by chapter 558;
16
(2) Sentence the person to pay a fine as authorized by
17
chapter 5 60;
18
(3) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or
19
without p lacing the person on probation;
20
(4) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution,
21
placing t he person on probation;
22
(5) Impose a period of detention as a condition of
23
probatio n , as authorized by section 559.026.
24
3. Whenever any person has been found guilty of an
25
infract i on, the court shall make one or more of the
26
following dispositions of the offender in any appropriate
27
combination. The court may:
28
(1) Sen t ence the person to pay a fine as authorized by
29
chapter 5 60;
30
(2) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or
31
without p lacing the person on probation;

SS#3 SB 888 47
32
(3) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution,
33
placing t he person on probation.
34
4. Whenever any organization has been found guilty of
35
an offe n se, the court shall make one or more of the
36
following dispositions of the organization in any
37
appropriate combination. The court may:
38
(1) Sentence the or g anization to pay a fine as
39
authoriz e d by chapter 560;
40
(2) Suspend the imposition of sentence, with or
41
without p lacing the organization on probation;
42
(3) Pronounce sentence and suspend its execution,
43
placing t he organization on probation;
44
(4) Impose any special sentence or sanction authorized
45
by law.
46
5. This chapter shall not be construed to deprive the
47
court o f any authority conferred by law to decree a
48
forfeiture of property, suspend or cancel a license, remove
49
a person from office, or impose any other civil penalty. An
50
appropriate order exercising such authority may be inclu d ed
51
as part of any sentence.
52
6. In the event a sentence of confinement is ordered
53
execute d , a court may order that an individual serve all or
54
any portion of such sentence on electronic monitoring;
55
except that all costs associated with the electronic
56
monitoring shall be charged to the person on house arrest.
57
If the judge finds the person unable to afford the costs
58
associated with electronic monitoring, the judge may order
59
that the person be placed on house arrest with electronic
60
monitoring if the county commission agrees to pay the costs
61
of such monitoring. If the person on house arrest is unable
62
to afford the costs associated with electronic monitoring
63
and the county commission does not agree to pay from the

SS#3 SB 888 48
64
general revenue of the county the costs of such electronic
65
monitoring, the judge shall not order that the person be
66
placed on house arrest with electronic monitoring.
1
557.021. 1. Any offense defined outside this code
2
[which] that i s d e clared to be a misdemeanor without
3
specification of the penalty therefor is a class A
4
misdemeanor.
5
2. Any offense defined outside this code [which] that
6
is decl a red to be a felony without specification of the
7
penalty therefor is a class E felony and subject to the
8
terms as provided in chapter 558.
9
3. For the purpose of applying the extended term
10
provisi o ns of section 558.016 [and the minimum prison term
11
provisions of], the parole eligibility provisions pursuant
12
to section [558.019] 558.011 and for determining the penalty
13
for attempts, offenses defined outside of this code shall be
14
classified as follows:
15
(1) If the offense is a felony:
16
(a) It is a class A felony if the authorized penalty
17
includes death, life imprisonment or imprisonment for a term
18
of twenty years or more;
19
(b) It is a class B felony if the maximum term of
20
imprison m ent authorized exceeds ten years but is less than
21
twenty years;
22
(c) It is a class C felony if the maximum term of
23
imprison m ent authorized is ten years;
24
(d) It is a class D felony if the maximum term of
25
imprison m ent exceeds four years but is less than ten years;
26
(e) It is a class E felony if the maximum term of
27
imprison m ent is four years or less;
28
(2) If the offense is a misdemeanor:

SS#3 SB 888 49
29
(a) It is a class A misdemeanor if the authorized
30
imprison m ent exceeds six months in jail;
31
(b) It is a class B misdemeanor if the authorized
32
imprison m ent exceeds thirty days but is not more than six
33
months;
34
(c) It is a class C misdemeanor if the authorized
35
imprison m ent is thirty days or less;
36
(d) It is a class D misdemeanor if it includes a
37
mental s t ate as an element of the offense and there is no
38
authorized imprisonment;
39
(e) It is an infraction if there is no authorized
40
imprison m ent.
1
558.011. 1. The authorized terms of imprisonment,
2
including bot h pr i son and conditional release terms, for all
3
offenses are as follows:
4
(1) For a class A felony, a term of years not less
5
than ten years and not to exceed thirty years, or life
6
imprisonment, for which an offender shall serve seventy
7
percent of the imposed sentence prior to parole eligibility;
8
(2) For a class B felony, a term of years not less
9
than fiv e years and not to exceed fifteen years, for which
10
an offender shall serve fifty percent of the imposed
11
sentence prior to parole eligibility;
12
(3) For a class C felony, a term of years not less
13
than thr e e years and not to exceed ten years, for which an
14
offender shall serve:
15
(a) Forty percent of the imposed sentence prior to
16
parole e l igibility for an offense under chapters 566, 568,
17
and 573 that requires registration as a sex offender under
18
chapter 589;

SS#3 SB 888 50
19
(b) Thirty percent of the imposed sentence prior to
20
parole e l igibility for a first offense other than an offense
21
under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
22
(c) Thirty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior
23
to parol e eligibility for a second offense other than an
24
offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
25
(d) Fifty percent of the imposed sentence prior to
26
parole e l igibility for a third or subsequent offense other
27
than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
28
(4) For a class D felony, a term of years not to
29
exceed s e ven years, for which an offender shall serve:
30
(a) Twenty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior
31
to parol e eligibility for an offense under chapters 566,
32
568, and 573 that requires registration as a sex offender
33
under chapter 589;
34
(b) Twenty percent of the imposed sentence prior to
35
parole e l igibility for a first offense other than an offense
36
under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
37
(c) Twenty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior
38
to parol e eligibility for a second offense other than an
39
offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
40
(d) Fifty percent of the imposed sentence prior to
41
parole e l igibility for a third or subsequent offense other
42
than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
43
(5) For a class E felony, a term of years not to
44
exceed f o ur years, for which an offender shall serve:
45
(a) Twenty-five percent of the imposed sentence prior
46
to parol e eligibility for an offense under chapters 566,
47
568, and 573 that requires registration as a sex offender
48
under chapter 589;

SS#3 SB 888 51
49
(b) Fifteen percent of the imposed sentence prior to
50
parole e l igibility for a first offense other than an offense
51
under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
52
(c) Twenty percent of the imposed sentence prior to
53
parole e l igibility for a second offense other than an
54
offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
55
(d) Fifty percent of the imposed sentence prior to
56
parole e l igibility for a third or subsequent offense other
57
than an offense under paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
58
(6) For a class A misdemeanor, a term not to exceed
59
one year ;
60
(7) For a class B misdemeanor, a term not to exceed
61
six mont h s;
62
(8) For a class C misdemeanor, a term not to exceed
63
fifteen d ays.
64
2. When a person is sentenced to the authorized term
65
of impr i sonment for a higher class than the offense for
66
which the person was found guilty under sections 558.016,
67
565.079, and 579.170, the person shall also be sentenced to
68
the parole eligibility percentage of the higher class.
69
3. The authorized terms of imprisonment under
70
subsect i ons 1 and 2 of this section shall apply to all
71
offenses, except if the terms for parole eligibility
72
otherwise provided by statute result in a higher parole
73
eligibility percentage, in which case the statute resulting
74
in the higher parole eligibility percentage shall apply.
75
4. The authorized terms of imprisonment under
76
subsect i on 1 of this section shall not apply to any offense
77
where a suspended imposition of sentence is imposed or where
78
the matter is referred to an adult treatment court as
79
provided in chapter 478.

SS#3 SB 888 52
80
5. In cases of class D and E felonies, the court shall
81
have di s cretion to imprison for a special term not to exceed
82
one year in the county jail or other authorized penal
83
institution, and the place of confinement shall be fixed by
84
the court. If the court imposes a sentence of imprisonment
85
for a term longer than one year upon a person convicted of a
86
class D or E felony, it shall commit the person to the
87
custody of the department of corrections.
88
[3.] 6. (1) When a regular sentence of imprisonment
89
for a fel ony is i m posed, the court shall commit the person
90
to the custody of the department of corrections for the term
91
imposed under section 557.036, or until released under
92
procedures established elsewhere by law.
93
(2) A sentence of imprisonment for a misdemeanor shall
94
be for a definite term and the court shall commit the person
95
to the county jail or other authorized penal institution for
96
the term of his or her sentence or until released under
97
procedure established elsewhere by law.
98
[4.] 7. (1) Except as otherwise provided, a sentence
99
of impris onm e nt f o r a term of years for felonies other than
100
dangerous felonies as defined in section 556.061, and other
101
than sentences of imprisonment which involve the
102
individual's fourth or subsequent remand to the department
103
of corrections shall consist of a prison term and a
104
conditional release term. The conditional release term of
105
any term imposed under se c tion 557.036 shall be:
106
(a) One-third for terms of nine years or less;
107
(b) Three years for terms between nine and fift een
108
years;
109
( c ) Five years for terms more than fifteen years; and
110
the pris o n term shall be the remainder of such term. The

SS#3 SB 888 53
111
prison term may be extended by the parole board pursuant to
112
subsection [5] 8 of this section.
113
(2) "Conditional release" me a ns the conditional
114
discharg e of an offender by the parole board, subject to
115
conditions of release that the parole board deems reasonable
116
to assist the offender to lead a law-abiding life, and
117
subject to the supervision under the division of probation
118
and parole. The conditions of release shall include
119
avoidance b y the offender of any other offense, federal or
120
state, and other conditions that the parole board in its
121
discretion deems reasonably necessary to assist the releasee
122
in avoiding further violation of the law.
123
[5.] 8. The date of conditional rele a se from the
124
prison te rm m ay be extended up to a maximum of the entire
125
sentence of imprisonment by the parole board. The director
126
of any division of the department of correcti o ns except the
127
division of probation and parole may file with the parole
128
board a petition to extend the conditional release date when
129
an offender fails to follow the rules and regulations of the
130
division or commits an act in violation of such rules.
131
Within ten working days of receipt of the petition to e xtend
132
the conditional release date, the parole board shall convene
133
a hearing on the petition. The offender shall be present
134
and may call witnesses in h is or her behalf and cross-
135
examine witnesses appearing against the offender. The
136
hearing shall be conducted as provided in section 217.670.
137
If the violation occurs in close proximity to the
138
conditional release date, the conditional release may be
139
held for a maximum of fifteen working days to permit
140
necessary time for the division director to file a petition
141
for an extension with the parole board and for the parole
142
board to conduct a hearing, provided some affirmative

SS#3 SB 888 54
143
manifestation of an intent to extend the conditional release
144
has occurred prior to the conditional release date. If at
145
the end of a fifteen-working-day period a parole bo a rd
146
decision has not been reached, the offender shall be
147
released conditionally. The decision of the parole board
148
shall be final.
149
9. Any person who commits a class A or B felony or an
150
offense under chapters 566, 568, and 573 that requires
151
registration as a sex offender under chapter 589, on or
152
after January 1, 2028, shall not be eligible for conditional
153
release for that offense.
154
10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
155
contrary , any offender who has been found guilty of a
156
dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061 and is
157
committed to the department of corrections shall be required
158
to serve eighty-five percent of the sentence imposed by the
159
court prior to parole eligibility.
160
11. For the purpose of determining the minimum time
161
required to be served by the offender before he or she is
162
eligible for parole, the following calculations shall apply:
163
(1) A sentence of life shall be calculated to be
164
thirty y e ars; and
165
(2) Any sentence either alone or in the aggregate with
166
other co n secutive sentences for offenses committed at or
167
near the same time that is over seventy-five years shall be
168
calculated to be seventy-five years.
169
12. When consecutive sentences are imposed by a court,
170
the mini m um percentage for each respective felony shall be
171
met prior to parole eligibility.
172
13. When concurrent sentences are imposed by a court,
173
the pers o n shall serve the minimum required percentage for
174
the longest sentence prior to parole eligibility.

SS#3 SB 888 55
1
558.016. 1. The court may sentence a person who has
2
been found gu i lty of an offense to a term of imprisonment as
3
authorized by section 558.011 or to a term of imprisonment
4
authorized by a statute governing the offense if it finds
5
the defendant is a prior offender or a persistent
6
misdemeanor offender. The court [may] shall sentence a
7
person to an extended term of imprisonment if:
8
(1) The defendant is a persistent offender or a
9
dangerou s offender, and the person is sentenced under
10
subsection 7 of this section;
11
(2) The statute under which the person was found
12
guilty c o ntains a sentencing enhancement provision that is
13
based on a prior finding of guilt or a finding of prior
14
criminal conduct and the person is sentenced according to
15
the statute; or
16
(3) A more specific sentencing enhancement provision
17
applies t hat is based on a prior finding of guilt or a
18
finding of prior criminal conduct.
19
2. A "prior offender" is one who has been found guilty
20
of one f elony.
21
3. A "persistent offender" is one who has been found
22
guilty o f two or more felonies committed at different times,
23
or one who has been previously found guilty of a dangerous
24
felony as defined in subdivision (19) of section 556.061.
25
4. A "dangerous offender" is one who:
26
(1 ) Is being sentenced for a felony during the
27
commissi o n of which he knowingly murdered or endangered or
28
threatened the life of another person or knowingly inflicted
29
or attempted or threatened to inflict serious physical
30
injury on another person; and
31
(2) Has been found guilty of a class A or B felony or
32
a danger o us felony.

SS#3 SB 888 56
33
5. A "persistent misdemeanor offender" is one who has
34
been fo u nd guilty of two or more offenses, committed at
35
different times that are classified as A or B misdemeanors
36
under the laws of this state.
37
6. The findings of guilt shall be prior to the date of
38
commiss i on of the present offense.
39
7. The court shall sentence a person, who has been
40
found t o be a persistent offender or a dangerous offender,
41
and is found guilty of a class B, C, D, or E felony to the
42
authorized term of imprisonment for the offense that is one
43
class higher than the offense for which the person is found
44
guilty.
1
558.019. 1. [This section shall not be construed to
2
affect the po w ers of the governor under Article IV, Section
3
7, of the Missouri Constitution. This statute shall not
4
affect those provisions of secti o n 565.020 or section
5
566.125, which set minimum terms of sentences, or the
6
provisions of section 559.115, relating to probation.
7
2. The provisions of subsections 2 to 5 of this
8
section shall only be applicable to the offenses contained
9
in sections 565.021, 565.023, 565.024, 565.027, 565.050,
10
565.052, 565.054, 565.072, 565.073, 565.074, 565.090,
11
565.110, 565.115, 565.120, 565.153, 565.156, 565.225,
12
565.300, 566.030, 566.031, 566.032, 566.034, 566.060,
13
566.061, 566.062, 566.064, 566.067, 566.068, 566.069,
14
566.071, 566.083, 566.086, 566.100, 566.101, 566.103,
15
566.111, 566.115, 566.145, 566.151, 566.153, 566.203,
16
566.206, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 566.215, 568.030,
17
568.045, 568.060, 568.065, 568.175, 569.040, 569.160,
18
570.023, 570.025, 570.030 when punished as a class A, B, or
19
C felony, 570.145 when punished as a class A or B felony,
20
570.223 when punished as a class B or C felony, 571.020,

SS#3 SB 888 57
21
571.030, 571.070, 573.023, 573.025, 573.035, 573.037,
22
573.200, 573.205, 574.070, 574.080, 574.115, 575.030,
23
575.150, 575.153, 575.155, 575.157, 575.200 when punished as
24
a class A felony, 575.210, 575.230 when punished as a class
25
B felony, 575.240 when punished as a class B felony,
26
576.070, 576.080, 577.010, 577.013, 577.078, 577.703,
27
577.706, 579.065, and 579.068 when punished as a class A or
28
B felony. For the purposes of this section, "prison
29
commitmen t " means and is the receipt by the department of
30
corrections of an offender after sentencing. For purposes
31
of this section, prior prison commitments to the department
32
of corrections shall not include an offender's first
33
incarceration prior to release on probation under section
34
217.362 or 559.115. Other provisions of the law to the
35
contrary notwithsta n ding, any offender who has been found
36
guilty of a felony other than a dangerous felony as defined
37
in section 556.061 and is committed to the department of
38
corrections shall be required to serve the following minimum
39
prison terms:
40
(1) If the offender has one previous prison commitment
41
to the d e partment of corrections for a felony offense, the
42
minimum prison term which the offender must serve shall be
43
forty percent of his or her sentence or until the offender
44
attains seventy years of age, and has served at least thirty
45
percent of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs first;
46
(2) If the offender has two previous prison
47
commitme n ts to the department of corrections for felonies
48
unrelated to the present offense, the minimum prison term
49
which the offender must serve shall be fifty percent of his
50
or her sentence or until the offender attains seventy years
51
of age, and has served at least forty percent of the
52
sentence imposed, whichever occurs first;

SS#3 SB 888 58
53
(3) If the offender has three or more previous prison
54
commitme n ts to the department of corrections for felonies
55
unrelated to the present offense, the minimum prison term
56
which the offender must serve shall be eighty percent of his
57
or her sentence or until the offender attains seventy years
58
of age, and has served at least forty percent of the
59
sentence imposed, whichever occurs first.
60
3. Other provisions of the law to the contrary
61
notwith s tanding, any offender who has been found guilty of a
62
dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061 and is
63
committed to the department of corrections shall be required
64
to serve a minimum prison term of eighty-five percent of the
65
sentence imposed by the court or until the offender attains
66
seventy years of age, and has served at least forty percent
67
of the sentence imposed, whichever occurs first.
68
4. For the purpose of determining the minimum prison
69
term to be served, the following calculations shall apply:
70
(1) A sentence of life shall be calculated to be
71
thirty y e ars;
72
(2) Any sentence either alone or in the aggregate with
73
other co n secutive sentences for offenses committed at or
74
near the same time which is over seventy-five years shall be
75
calculated to be seventy-five years.
76
5. For purposes of this section, the term "minimum
77
prison t erm" shall mean time required to be served by the
78
offender before he or she is eligible for parole,
79
conditional release or other early release by the department
80
of corrections.
81
6. An offender who was convicted of, or pled guilty
82
to, a f e lony offense other than those offenses listed in
83
subsection 2 of this section prior to August 28, 2019, shall
84
no longer be subject to the minimum prison term provisions

SS#3 SB 888 59
85
under subsection 2 of this section, and shall be eligible
86
for parole, conditional release, or other early release by
87
the department of corrections according to the rules and
88
regulations of the department.
89
7.] (1) A sentencing advisory commission is hereby
90
created t o co n sist of eleven members. One member shall be
91
appointed by the speaker of the house . One member shall be
92
appointed by the president pro tem of t he senate. One
93
member shall be the director of the department of
94
corrections. Six members shall be appointed by and serve at
95
the pleasure of the governor from among the following: the
96
public defender commission; private citizens; a private
97
member of the Missouri Bar; the board of probation and
98
parole; and a prosecutor. Two members shall be appointed by
99
the supreme court, one fr o m a metropolitan area and one from
100
a rural area. All members shall be appointed to a four-year
101
term. All mem b ers of the sentencing commission appointed
102
prior to August 28, 1994, shall continue to serve on the
103
sentencing advisory commission at the pleasure of the
104
governor.
105
(2) The commission shall study sentencing practices in
106
the circ u it courts throughout the state for the purpose of
107
determining whether and to what extent disparities exist
108
among the various circuit courts with respect to the length
109
of sentences imposed and the use of probation for offenders
110
convicted of the same or similar offenses and with similar
111
criminal histories. The commission shall also study and
112
examine whether and to what extent sentencing disparity
113
among economic and social classes exists in relation to the
114
sentence of death and if so, the reasons therefor, if
115
sentences are comparable to other states, if the length of
116
the sentence is appropriate, and the rate of rehabilitation

SS#3 SB 888 60
117
based on sentence. It shall compile statistics, examine
118
cases, draw conclu s ions, and perform other duties relevant
119
to the research and investigation of disparities in death
120
penalty sentencing among economic and social classes.
121
(3) The commission shall study alternative sentences,
122
prison w o rk programs, work release, home-based
123
incarceration, probation and parole options, and any other
124
programs and report the feasibility of these options in
125
Missouri.
126
(4) The governor shall select a chairperson who shall
127
call mee t ings of the commission as required or permitted
128
pursuant to the purpose of the sentencing commission.
129
(5) The members of the commission shall not receive
130
compensa t ion for their duties on the commission, but shall
131
be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in
132
the performance of these duties and for which they are not
133
reimbursed by reason of their other paid positions.
134
(6) The circuit and associate circuit courts of this
135
state, t h e office of the state courts administrator, the
136
department of public safety, and the department of
137
corrections shall cooperate with the commission by providing
138
information or access to information needed by the
139
commission. The office of the state courts administrator
140
will provid e needed staffing resources.
141
[8.] 2. Courts shall retain discretion to lower or
142
exceed th e s e ntence recommended by the commission as
143
otherwise allowable by law, and to order restorative justice
144
methods, when applicable.
145
[9.] 3. If the imposition or execution of a sentence
146
is suspen ded , the court may order any or all of the
147
following restorative justice methods, or any other method
148
that the court finds just or appropriate:

SS#3 SB 888 61
149
(1) Restitution to any victim or a statutorily created
150
fund for costs incurred as a result of the offender's
151
actions;
152
(2) Offender treatment programs;
153
(3) Mandatory community service;
154
(4) Work release programs in local facilities; and
155
(5) Community-based residential and nonresidential
156
programs .
157
[10.] 4. Pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection [9]
158
3 of this sec t ion, the court may order the assessment and
159
payment of a designated amount of restitution to a county
160
law enforcement restitution fund established by the county
161
commission pursuant to section 50.565. Such contribution
162
shall not exceed three hundred dollars for any charged
163
offense. Any restitution moneys deposited into the county
164
law enfo r cement restitution fund pursuant to this section
165
shall only be expended pursuant to the provisions of section
166
50.565.
167
[11.] 5. A judge may order payment to a restitution
168
fund only if s uch fund had been created by ordinance or
169
resolution of a county of the state of Missouri prior to
170
sentencing. A judge shall not have any direct supervisory
171
authority o r administrative control over any fund to which
172
the judge is ordering a person to make payment.
173
[12.] 6. A person who fails to make a payment to a
174
county law en f orcement restitution fund may not have his or
175
her probation revoked solely for failing to make such
176
payment unless the judge, after evidentiary hearing, makes a
177
finding supported by a preponderance of the evidence that
178
the person either willfully refused to make the payment or
179
that the person willfully, intentionally, and purposefully

SS#3 SB 888 62
180
failed to make sufficient bona fide efforts to acquire the
181
resources to pay.
182
[13.] 7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
183
allow the s ent encing a dvi sory commissi on to iss ue
184
recom mend ed sentence s in spec ific cases p en ding i n the
185
courts of th is state.
1
5 58. 026. 1. Multiple sentences of imprisonment shall
2
run concurren t ly u nless the court specifies that they shall
3
run consecutively; except in the case of multiple sentences
4
of imprisonment imposed for any offense committed during or
5
at the same time as, or multiple offenses of, the following
6
felonies:
7
(1) Rape in the first degree, forcible rape, or rape;
8
(2) Statutory rape in the first degree;
9
(3) Sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy, or
10
sodomy;
11
(4) Statutory sodomy in the first degree; or
12
(5) An attempt to commit any of the felonies listed in
13
this sub s ection. In such case, the sentence of imprisonment
14
imposed for any felony listed in this subsection or an
15
attempt to commit any of the aforesaid shall run
16
consecutively to the other sentences. The sentences imposed
17
for any other offense may run concurr e ntly.
18
2. If a person who is on probation, parole or
19
conditi o nal release is sentenced to a term of imprisonment
20
for an offense committed after the granting of probation or
21
parole or after the start of his or her conditional release
22
term, the court shall direct the manner in which the
23
sentence or sentences imposed by the court shall run with
24
respect to any resulting probation, parole or conditional
25
release revocation term or terms. If the subsequent
26
sentence to imprisonment is in an o ther jurisdiction, the

SS#3 SB 888 63
27
court shall specify how any resulting probation, parole or
28
conditional release revocation term or terms shall run with
29
respect to the foreign sentence of imprisonment.
30
3. A court may cause any sentence it imposes to run
31
concurr e ntly with a sentence an individual is serving or is
32
to serve in another state or in a federal correctional
33
center. If the Missouri sentence is served in another state
34
or in a federal correctional center, subsection [4] 7 of
35
section 558.011 and section 217.690 shall apply as if the
36
individual were serving his or her sentence within the
37
department of corrections of the state of Missouri, except
38
that a personal hearing before the parole board shall not be
39
required for parole consideration.
1
558.031. 1. A sentence of imprisonment shall commence
2
when a person con v icted of an offense in this state is
3
received into the custody of the department of corrections
4
or other place of confinement where the offender is
5
sentenced.
6
2. [Such] When placing a person on probation for a
7
suspend e d imposition of sentence, probation for a suspended
8
execution of sentence, or when executing a sentence of
9
imprisonment, the court shall record, as part of each
10
judgment, the number of days the person [shall receive
11
credit toward the service of a sentence of imprisonment for
12
all time] was in prison, jail, or custody, that was related
13
to the offense, after the offense occurred and before [the
14
commencement of the sentence, when the time in custody was
15
related to that offense] being sentenced to imprisonment and
16
the defendant shall be awarded credit toward the service of
17
a sentence of imprisonment for that number of days. [This]
18
The jail time credit calculation shall be based upo n the
19
certification of the sheriff as provided in subdivision (3)

SS#3 SB 888 64
20
of subsection 2 of section 217.305 and may be supplemented
21
by a certificate of a sheriff or other custodial officer
22
from another jurisdiction having held the person on the
23
charge of the offense for which the sentence of imprisonment
24
is ordered and shall be pronounced at the time of the
25
judgment, the execution of a suspended sentence, or the
26
suspension of imposition of sentence, shall be included in
27
the record, and shall include both the dates the person was
28
in custody and the number of days to be credited toward the
29
service of the sentence.
30
3. For purposes of this section, time in custody
31
related to an offense includes time during which the offense
32
was charged in a criminal proceeding, there was an arrest
33
warrant issued in said criminal proceeding, and the arrest
34
warrant was served upon the person, and includes time served
35
on house arrest. The person shall not be entitled to any
36
credit toward the service of a sentence of imprisonment for
37
any time such person was not being held on said arrest
38
warrant because such person posted bond, the arrest warrant
39
was recalled, or the person was otherwise released.
40
4. The court may take judicial notice of all time the
41
person h as served in prison, jail, or custody, or on house
42
arrest for a criminal proceeding by comparing dates of
43
service on arrest warrants with evidence contained within
44
the court file of dates of release and the prosecution and
45
defense attorney may enter into a stipulation with regard to
46
credit for the service of a sentence of imprisonment for all
47
time in prison, jail, or custody, or on house arrest except
48
in no event may the court approve a stipulation that is
49
greater than or less than the time in custody related to an
50
offense.

SS#3 SB 888 65
51
5. Upon motion and notice by defendant or defense
52
counsel , for any such person who was held in a juvenile
53
detention facility for an offense for which such person was
54
subsequently adjudicated to stand trial as an adult, the
55
court may also award credit toward the service of a sentence
56
of imprisonment for any time such person was confined in a
57
juvenile detention facility.
58
6. In the event a criminal proceeding related to an
59
offense is dismissed without prejudice by a court or nolle
60
prossed by the state, upon motion and notice by defendant or
61
defense counsel, the proceeding may be consolidated into the
62
present matter for purposes of calculating credit for the
63
service of a sentence of imprisonment.
64
7. The officer required by law to deliver a person
65
convict e d of an offense in this state to the department of
66
corrections shall endorse upon the papers required by
67
section 217.305 both the dates the offender was in custody
68
and the period of time to be credited toward the service of
69
the sentence of imprisonment, [except as endorsed by such
70
officer] included in the judgment or suspended imposition of
71
sentence and such additional days after the pronouncement of
72
sentence and before the delivery of the person to the
73
department of corrections.
74
[4.] 8. If a person convicted of an offense escapes
75
from cust ody , such escape shall interrupt the sentence. The
76
interruption shall continue until such person is return e d to
77
the correctional center where the sentence was being served,
78
or in the case of a person committed to the custody of the
79
department of corrections, to any correctional center
80
operated by the department of corrections. An escape shall
81
also interrupt the jail time credit to be a pplied to a
82
sentence which had not commenced when the escape occurred.

SS#3 SB 888 66
83
[5.] 9. If a sentence of imprisonment is vacated and a
84
new sente nce imposed upon the offender for that offense, all
85
time served under the vacated sentence shall be credited
86
against the new sentence, unless the time has already been
87
credited to another sentence as provided in subsection 1 of
88
this section.
89
[6.] 10. If a person released from imprisonment on
90
parole or ser v ing a conditional release term violates any of
91
the conditions of his or her parole or release, he or she
92
may be treated as a parole violator. If the parole board
93
revokes the parole or conditional re l ease, the paroled
94
person shall serve the remainder of the prison term and
95
conditional release term, as an additional prison term, and
96
the conditionally released person shall serve the remainder
97
of the conditional release term as a prison term, unless
98
released on parole.
99
[7. Subsection 2 of this section shall be applicable
100
to offen s es for which the offender was sentenced on or after
101
August 28, 2023.
102
8. The total amount of credit given shall not exceed
103
the num b er of days spent in prison, jail, or custody after
104
the offense occurred and before the commencement of the
105
sentence.]
106
11. A person may only challenge credit awarded or not
107
awarded p ursuant to this section by the filing of a petition
108
for a writ of habeas corpus.
1
558.046. The sentencing court may, upon petition,
2
reduce any te r m of sentence or probation pronounced by the
3
court or a term of conditional release or parole pronounced
4
by the parole board if the court determines that:
5
(1) The convicted person was:

SS#3 SB 888 67
6
(a) Convicted of an offense that did not involve
7
violence or the threat of violence; and
8
(b) Convicted of an offense that involved alcohol or
9
illegal d rugs; and
10
(2) Since the commission of such offense, the
11
convicte d person has successfully completed a detoxification
12
and rehabilitation program; and
13
(3) The convicted person is not:
14
(a) A prior offender, a persistent offender, a
15
dangerou s offender or a persistent misdemeanor offender as
16
defined by section 558.016; or
17
(b) A persistent sexual offender as defined in section
18
566.125[ ; or
19
(c) A prior offender, a persistent offender or a class
20
X offend e r as defined in section 558.019].
1
559.115. 1. Neither probation nor parole shall be
2
granted by th e ci r cuit court between the time the transcript
3
on appeal from the offender's conviction has been filed in
4
appellate court and the disposition of the appeal by such
5
court.
6
2. Unless otherwise prohibited by subsection [8] 7 of
7
this se c tion, a circuit court only upon its own motion and
8
not that of the state or the offender shall have the power
9
to grant probation to an offender anytime up to one hundred
10
twenty days after such offender has been delivered to the
11
department of corrections but not thereafter. The court may
12
request information and a recommendation from the department
13
concerning the offender and such offender's behavior during
14
the period of incarceration. Except as provided in this
15
section, the court may place the offender on probation in a
16
program created pursuant to section 217.777, or may place

SS#3 SB 888 68
17
the offender on probation with any other conditions
18
authorized by law.
19
3. The court may recommend placement of an offender in
20
a depar t ment of corrections one hundred twenty-day program
21
under this subsection. The department of corrections shall
22
assess each offender t o determine the appropriate one
23
hundred twenty-day program in which to place the offender,
24
which may include placement in the structured cognitive
25
behavioral intervention program or institutional treatment
26
program. The placement of an offender in the structured
27
cognitiv e behavioral intervention program or institutional
28
treatment program shall be at the sole discretion of the
29
department based on the assessment of the offender and
30
available bed space. When the court recommends and receives
31
placement of an offe n der in a department of corrections one
32
hundred twenty-day program, the offender shall be released
33
on probation if the department of corrections determines
34
that the offender has successfully completed the program
35
except as follows. Upon successful completion of a program
36
under this subsect i on, the division of probation and parole
37
shall advise the sentencing court of an offender's
38
probationary release date thirty days prior to release. The
39
court shall follow the recommendation of the department
40
unless the court determines that probation is not
41
appropriate. If the court determines that probation is not
42
appropriate, the court may order the execution of the
43
offender's sentence only after conducting a hearing on the
44
matter within ninety to one hundred twenty days from the
45
date the offender was delivered to the department of
46
corrections. If the department determines the offender has
47
not successf u lly completed a one hundred twenty-day program
48
under this subsection, the division of probation and parole

SS#3 SB 888 69
49
shall advise the prosecuting attorney and the sentencing
50
court of the defendant's unsuccessful program exit and the
51
defendant shall be removed from the program. The department
52
shall report on the offender's participation in the program
53
and may provide recommendations for terms and conditions of
54
an offender's probation. The court shall then have the
55
power to grant probation or order the execution of the
56
offender's sentence.
57
4. If the court is advised that an offender is not
58
eligibl e for placement in a one hundred twenty-day program
59
under subsection 3 of this section, the court shall consider
60
other authorized dispositions. If the department of
61
corrections one hundred twenty - day program under subsection
62
3 of this section is full, the court may place the offender
63
in a private program approved by the department of
64
corrections or the court, the expenses of such program to be
65
paid by the offender, or in an available program offered by
66
another organization. If the offender is convicted of a
67
class C, class D, or class E nonviolent felony, the court
68
may order probation while awaiting appointment to treatment.
69
5. Except when the offender has been found to be a
70
predato r y sexual offender pursuant to section 566.125, the
71
court shall request the department of corrections to conduct
72
a sexual offender assessment if the defendant has been found
73
guilty of sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony.
74
Upon completion of the assessment, the department shall
75
provide to the court a report on the offender and may
76
provide recommendations for terms and conditions of an
77
offender's probation. The assessment shall not be
78
considered a one hundr ed twenty-day program as provided
79
under subsection 3 of this section. The process for
80
granting probation to an offender w h o has completed the

SS#3 SB 888 70
81
assessment shall be as provided under subsections 2 and 6 of
82
this section.
83
6. Unless the offender is being granted probation
84
pursuan t to successful completion of a one hundred twenty-
85
day program the circuit court shall notify the state in
86
writing when the court intends to grant probation to the
87
offender pursuant to the provisions of this section. The
88
state may, in writing, request a hearing within ten d ays of
89
receipt of the court's notification that the court intends
90
to grant probation. Upon the state's request for a hearing,
91
the court shall gra n t a hearing as soon as reasonably
92
possible. If the state does not respond to the court's
93
notice in writing within ten days, the court may proceed
94
upon its own motion to grant probation.
95
7. [An offender's first incarceration under this
96
section prior to release on probation shall not be
97
considered a previous prison commitment for the purpose of
98
determining a minimum prison term under the provisions of
99
section 558.019.
100
8.] Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
101
probatio n may not be granted pursuant to this section to
102
offenders who have been convicted of murder in the second
103
degree pursuant to section 565.021; forcible rape pursuant
104
to section 566.030 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013;
105
rape in the first degree under section 566.030; forcible
106
sodomy pursuant to section 566.060 as it existed prior to
107
August 28, 2013; sodomy in the first degree under section
108
566.060; statutory rape in the first degree pursuant to
109
section 566.032; statutory sodomy in the first degree
110
pursuant to section 566.062; child molestation in the first
111
degree pursuant to section 566.067 when classified as a
112
class A felony; abuse of a child pursuant to section 568.060

SS#3 SB 888 71
113
when classified as a class A felony; or an offender who has
114
been found to be a predatory sexual offender pursuant to
115
section 566.125; any offense under section 557.045; or any
116
offense in which there exists a statutory prohibition
117
against either probation or parole.
1
566.030. 1. A person commits the offense of rape in
2
the first deg r ee i f he or she has sexual intercourse with
3
another person who is incapacitated, incapable of consent,
4
or lacks the capacity to consent, or by the use of forcible
5
compulsion. Forcible compulsion includes the use of a
6
substance a d ministered without a victim's knowledge or
7
consent which renders the victim physically or mentally
8
impaired so as to be incapable of making an informed consent
9
to sexual intercourse.
10
2. The offense of rape in the first degree or an
11
attempt to commit rape in the first degree is a class A
12
felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life
13
imprisonment or a term of years not less than [five] ten
14
years, not to exceed thirty years, unless:
15
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, in
16
which ca s e the authorized term of imprisonment is life
17
imprisonment as defined in section 558.011 or [a term of
18
years not less than fifteen years] life imprisonment without
19
eligibility for probation or parole;
20
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual
21
offender as defined in section 566.125 and subjected to an
22
extended term of imprisonment under said section;
23
(3) The victim is a child less than twelve years of
24
age, in w hich case the required term of imprisonment is life
25
imprisonment as defined in section 558.011 or life
26
imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole
27
[until the offender has served not less than thirty years of

SS#3 SB 888 72
28
such sentence or unless the offender has reached the age of
29
seventy-five years and has served at least fifteen years of
30
such sentence, unless such rape in the first degree is
31
described under subdivision (4) of this subsection]; or
32
(4) The victim is a child less than twelve years of
33
age and s uch rape in the first degree or attempt to commit
34
rape in the first degree was outrageously or wantonly vile,
35
horrible or inhumane, in that it involved torture or
36
depravity of mind, in which case the required term of
37
imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for
38
probation, parole or conditional release.
39
3. [Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to
40
the sen t ence of a person who has been found guilty of rape
41
in the first degree or attempt to commit rape in the first
42
degree when the victim is less than twelve years of age, and
43
"life imprisonment" shall mean imprisonment for the duration
44
of a person's natural life for the purposes of this section.
45
4.] No person found guilty of rape in the first degree
46
or an att e mpt to com mit ra pe in t he first de gre e shal l be
47
gr ant ed a susp en ded imp ositi on of s entenc e or su spende d
48
executi on of senten ce.
1
566.0 32 . 1. A person commits the offense of statutory
2
rape in the f i rst degree if he or she has sexual intercourse
3
with another person who is less than fourteen years of age.
4
2. The offense of statutory rape in the first degree
5
or an a t tempt to commit statutory rape in the first degree
6
is a felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is
7
life imprisonment or a term of years not less than [five]
8
ten years, unless:
9
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, or
10
the vict i m is less than twelve years of age in which case

SS#3 SB 888 73
11
the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment or
12
a term of years not less than [ten] fifteen years; or
13
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual
14
offender as defined in section 566.125 and subjected to an
15
extended term of imprisonment under said section.
1
566.060. 1. A person commits the offense of sodomy in
2
the first deg r ee i f he or she has deviate sexual intercourse
3
with another person who is incapacitated, incapable of
4
consent, or lacks the capacity to consent, or by the use of
5
forcible compulsion. Forcible compulsion includes the use
6
of a substance admin i stered without a victim's knowledge or
7
consent which renders the victim physically or mentally
8
impaired so as to be incapable of making an informed consent
9
to sexual intercourse.
10
2. The offense of sodomy in the first degree or an
11
attempt to commit sodomy in the first degree is a felony for
12
which the authorized term of imprisonment is life
13
imprisonment or a term of years not less than five years,
14
unless:
15
(1) The offense is an aggravated sexual offense, in
16
which ca s e the authorized term of imprisonment is life
17
imprisonment or a term of years not less than ten years;
18
(2) The person is a persistent or predatory sexual
19
offender as defined in section 566.125 and subjected to an
20
extended term of imprisonment under said section;
21
(3) The victim is a child less than twelve years of
22
age, in w hich case the required term of imprisonment is life
23
imprisonment as defined in section 558.011 or life
24
imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole
25
[until the offender has served not less than thirty years of
26
such sentence or unless the offender has reached the age of
27
seventy-five years and has served at least fifteen years of

SS#3 SB 888 74
28
such sentence, unless such sodomy in the first degree is
29
described under subdivision (4) of this subsection]; or
30
(4) The victim is a child less than twelve years of
31
age and s uch sodomy in the first degree or attempt to commit
32
sodomy in the first degree was outrageously or wantonly
33
vile, horrible or inhumane, in that it involved torture or
34
depravity of mind, in which case the required term of
35
imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for
36
probation, parole or conditional release.
37
3. [Subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to
38
the sen t ence of a person who has been found guilty of sodomy
39
in the first degree or an attempt to commit sodomy in the
40
first degree when the victim is less than twelve years of
41
age, and "life imprisonment" shall mean imprisonment for the
42
duration of a person's natural life for the purposes of this
43
section.
44
4.] No person found guilty of sodomy in the first
45
degree or an attempt to co mmit so do my in th e f irs t degr ee
46
shall b e g ran ted a su spe nded im positi on of s entenc e or
47
suspe nde d execut io n of sente nce.
1
566. 103. 1. A pe rson or entity commits the offense of
2
promoting onl i ne s exual solicitation if such person or
3
entity knowingly permits a web-based classified service
4
owned or operated by such person or entity to be used by
5
individuals to post advertisements promoting prostitution,
6
enticing a child to engage in sexual conduct, or promoting
7
sexual trafficking of a child after receiving notice under
8
this section.
9
2. As used in this section, the term "web-based
10
classif i ed service" means a person or entity in whose name a
11
specific URL or internet domain name is registered which has

SS#3 SB 888 75
12
advertisements for goods and services or personal
13
advertisements.
14
3. An advertisement may be deemed to promote
15
prostit u tion, entice a child to engage in sexual conduct, or
16
promote sexual trafficking of a child, if the content of
17
such advertisement would be interpreted by a reasonable
18
person as offering to exchange sexual conduct for goods or
19
services in violation of chapter 567, as seeking a child for
20
the purpose of sexual conduct or commercial sex act, or as
21
offering a child as a participant in sexual conduct or
22
commercial sex act in violation of section 566.151,
23
566.210, or 566.211.
24
4. It shall be prima facie evidence that a person or
25
entity a cts knowingly if an advertisement is not removed
26
from the web-based classified service within seventy-two
27
hours of that person or entity being notified that an
28
advertisement has been posted on that service which is
29
prohibited under this section.
30
5. Notice under this section may be provided by
31
certifi e d mail or facsimile transmission by the attorney
32
general or any prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney.
33
6. A violation of this section shall be a class E
34
felony, punishable by imprisonment or a fine in the amount
35
of five thousand dollars per day that the advertisement
36
remains posted on the web-based classified service after
37
seventy-two hours of when notice has been provided pursuant
38
to this section, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
39
7. Original jurisdiction for prosecution of a
40
violati o n of this section shall be with the local
41
prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney.
1
566.125. 1. The court shall sentence a person to an
2
extended term of i mprisonment if it finds the defendant is a

SS#3 SB 888 76
3
persistent sexual offender and has been found guilty of
4
attempting to commit or committing the following offenses:
5
(1) Statutory rape in the first degree or statutory
6
sodomy i n the first degree;
7
(2) Rape in the first degree or sodomy in the first
8
degree;
9
(3) Forcible rape;
10
(4) Forcible sodomy;
11
(5) Rape;
12
(6) Sodomy.
13
2. A "persistent sexual offender" is one who has
14
previou s ly been found guilty of attempting to commit or
15
committing any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of
16
this section or one who has previously been found guilty of
17
an offense in any other jurisdiction which would constitute
18
any of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section.
19
3. The term of imprisonment for one found to be a
20
persist e nt sexual offender shall be imprisonment for life
21
without eligibility for probation or parole. [Subsection 4
22
of section 558.019 shall not apply to any pe r son imprisoned
23
under this subsection, and] "Imprisonment for life" shall
24
mean imprisonment for the duration of the person's natural
25
life.
26
4. The court shall sentence a person to an extended
27
term of imprisonment as provided for in this section if it
28
finds the defendant is a predatory sexual offender and has
29
been found guilty of committing or attempting to commit any
30
of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section or
31
committing child molestation in the first or second degree
32
or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony.
33
5. For purposes of this section, a "predatory sexual
34
offende r " is a person who:

SS#3 SB 888 77
35
(1) Has previously been found guilty of committing or
36
attempti n g to commit any of the offenses listed in
37
subsection 1 of this section, or committing child
38
molestation in the first or second degree, or sexual abuse
39
when classified as a class B felony; or
40
(2) Has previously committed an act which would
41
constitu t e an offense listed in subsection 4 of this
42
section, whether or not the act resulted in a conviction; or
43
(3) Has committed an act or acts against more than one
44
victim w h ich would constitute an offense or offenses listed
45
in subsection 4 of this section, whether or not the
46
defendant was charged with an additional offense or offenses
47
as a result of such act or acts.
48
6. A person found to be a predatory sexual offender
49
shall b e imprisoned for life with eligibility for parole[,
50
however subsection 4 of section 558.019 shall not apply to
51
persons found to be predatory sexual offenders for the
52
purposes of determining the minimum prison term or the
53
length of sentence as defined or used in such subsection].
54
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in no event
55
shall a person found to be a predatory sexual offender
56
receive a final discharge from parole.
57
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
58
court s h all set the minimum time required to be served
59
before a predatory sexual offender is eligible for parole,
60
conditional release or other early release by the department
61
of corrections. The minimum time to be served by a person
62
found to be a p r edatory sexual offender who:
63
(1) Has previously been found guilty of committing or
64
attempti n g to commit any of the offenses listed in
65
subsection 1 of this section and is found guilty of
66
committing or attempting to commit any of the offenses

SS#3 SB 888 78
67
listed in subsection 1 of this section shall be any number
68
of years but not less than thirty years;
69
(2) Has previously been found guilty of child
70
molestat i on in the first or second degree, or sexual abuse
71
when classified as a class B felony and is found guilty of
72
attempting to commit or committing any of the offenses
73
listed in subsection 1 of this section shall be any number
74
of years but not less than fifteen years;
75
(3) Has previously been found guilty of committing or
76
attempti n g to commit any of the offenses listed in
77
subsection 1 of this section, or committing child
78
molestation in the first or second degree, or sexual abuse
79
when classified as a class B felony shall be any number of
80
years but not less than fifteen years;
81
(4) Has previously been found guilty of child
82
molestat i on in the first degree or second degree, or sexual
83
abuse when classified as a class B felony, and is found
84
guilty of child molestation in the first or second degree,
85
or sexual abuse when classified as a class B felony shall be
86
any number of years but not less than fifteen years;
87
(5) Is found to be a predatory sexual offender
88
pursuant to subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 5 of this
89
section shall be any number of years within the range to
90
which the person could have been sentenced pursuant to the
91
applicable law if the person was not found to be a predatory
92
sexual offender.
93
8. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
94
contrar y , the department of corrections, or any division
95
thereof, may not furlough an individual found to be and
96
sentenced as a persistent sexual offender or a predatory
97
sexual offender.

SS#3 SB 888 79
1
566.203. 1. A person commits the offense of abusing
2
an individual thr o ugh forced labor by knowingly providing or
3
obtaining the labor or services of a person:
4
(1) By causing or threatening to cause serious
5
physical injury to any person;
6
(2) By physically restraining or threatening to
7
physical l y restrain another person;
8
(3) By blackmail;
9
(4) By means of any scheme, plan, or pattern of
10
behavior intended to cause such person to believe that, if
11
the person does not perform the labor services, the person
12
or another person will suffer serious physical injury,
13
physical restraint, or financial harm; or
14
(5) By means of the abuse or threatened abuse of the
15
law or t h e legal process.
16
2. A person who is found guilty of the crime of abuse
17
through forced labor shall not be required to register as a
18
sexual offender pursuant to the provisions of section
19
589.400, unless such person is otherwise required to
20
register pursuant to the provisions of such section.
21
3. The offense of abuse through forced labor is a
22
felony p unishable by imprisonment for a term of years not
23
less than five years and not more than twenty years and a
24
fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
25
4. If death results from a violation of this sect i on,
26
or if t h e violation includes kidnapping or an attempt to
27
kidnap, sexual abuse when punishable as a class B felony, or
28
an attempt to commit sexual abuse when punishable as a class
29
B felony, or an attempt to kill, it shall be punishable for
30
a term of years not less than [five] ten years or life and a
31
fine not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars.

SS#3 SB 888 80
1
566.209. 1. A person commits the [crime] offense of
2
trafficking f o r t h e purposes of sexual exploitation if a
3
person knowingly recruits, entices, harbors, transports,
4
provides, advertises the availability of or obtains by any
5
means, including but not limited to through the use of
6
force, intoxicating or inhibiting substances, abduction,
7
coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail, or causing or
8
threatening to cause financial harm, another person for the
9
use or employment of such person in a commercial sex act,
10
sexual conduct, a sexual performance, or the production of
11
explicit sexual material as defined in section 573.010,
12
without his or her consent, or benefits, financially or by
13
receiving anything of value, from participation in such
14
activities.
15
2. The [crime] offense of trafficking for the purposes
16
of sexu a l exploitation is a felony punishable by
17
imprisonment for a term of years not less than five years
18
and not more than twenty years and a fine not to exceed two
19
hundred fifty thousand dollars. If a violation of this
20
section was effected by force, a bduction, or coercion, the
21
crime of trafficking for the purposes of sexual exploitation
22
is a felony punishable by imprisonment for a term of years
23
not less than ten years or life and a fine not to exceed two
24
hundred fifty thousand dollars.
1
566.210. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual
2
trafficking o f a c hild in the first degree if he or she
3
knowingly:
4
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides,
5
or obtai n s by any means, including but not limited to
6
through the use of force, abduction, coercion, fraud,
7
deception, blackmail, or causing or threatening to cause

SS#3 SB 888 81
8
financial harm, a person under the age of fourteen to
9
participate in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance,
10
or the production of explicit sexual material as defined in
11
section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving
12
anything of value, from participation in such activities;
13
(2) Causes a person under the age of fourteen to
14
engage i n a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the
15
production of explicit sexual material as defined in section
16
573.010; or
17
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the
18
age of f o urteen to participate in a commercial sex act, a
19
sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
20
material as defined in section 573.010.
21
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant
22
believe d that the person was fourteen years of age or older.
23
3. The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the
24
first d e gree is a felony for which the authorized term of
25
imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for
26
probation or parole until the offender has served not less
27
than thirty years of such sentence. [Subsection 4 of
28
section 558.019 shall not apply to t he sentence of a person
29
who has been found guilty of sexual trafficking of a child
30
less than fourteen years of age, and "life imprisonment"
31
shall mean imprisonment for the duration of a person's
32
natural life for the purposes of this section.]
1
566.211. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual
2
trafficking o f a c hild in the second degree if he or she
3
knowingly:
4
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides,
5
or obtai n s by any means, including but not limited to
6
through the use of force, abduction, coercion, fraud,

SS#3 SB 888 82
7
deception, blackmail, or causing or threatening to cause
8
financial harm, a person under the age of eighteen to
9
participate in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance,
10
or the production of explicit sexual material as defined in
11
section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving
12
anything of value, from participation in such activities;
13
(2) Causes a person under the age of eighteen to
14
engage i n a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the
15
production of explicit sexual material as defined in section
16
573.010; or
17
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the
18
age of e i ghteen to participate in a commercial sex act, a
19
sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
20
material as defined in section 573.010.
21
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant
22
believe d that the person was eighteen years of age or older.
23
3. The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the
24
second d egree is a felony punishable by imprisonment for a
25
term of years not less than twenty years or life and a fine
26
not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars if the
27
child is under the age of eighteen. If a violation of this
28
section was effected by force, abdu c tion, or coercion, the
29
[crime] offense of sexual trafficking of a child shall be a
30
felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life
31
imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole
32
until the defendant has served [not less than twenty-five
33
years] eighty-five percent of such sentence as provided
34
under section 558.011.
1
568.045. 1. A person commits the offense of
2
endangering t h e w e lfare of a child in the first degree if he
3
or she:

SS#3 SB 888 83
4
(1) Knowingly acts in a manner that creates a
5
substant i al risk to the life, body, or health of a child
6
less than [seventeen] eighteen years of age;
7
(2) Knowingly engages in sexual conduct with a person
8
under th e age of eighteen years over whom the person is a
9
parent, guardian, or otherwise charged with the care and
10
custody;
11
(3) Knowingly encourages, aids or causes a child less
12
than [se v enteen] eighteen years of age to engage in any
13
conduct which violates the provisions of chapter 571 or 579;
14
or
15
(4) In the presence of a child less than [seventeen]
16
eighteen years of age or in a residence where a child less
17
than [seventeen] eighteen years of age resides, unlawfully
18
manufactures or attempts to manufacture compounds,
19
possesses, produces, prepares, sells, transports, tests or
20
analyzes any of the following: fentanyl, carfentanil,
21
amphetamine, or methamphetamin e , or any analogue thereof.
22
2. The offense of endangering the welfare of a child
23
in the f irst degree is a class D felony unless the offense:
24
(1) Is committed as part of an act or series of acts
25
performe d by two or more persons as part of an established
26
or prescribed pattern of activity, or where physical injury
27
to the child results, or the offense is a second or
28
subsequent offense under this section, in which case the
29
offense is a class C felony;
30
(2) Involves fentanyl or carfentanil, or any analogue
31
thereof, in which case:
32
(a) The offense is a class B felony; and

SS#3 SB 888 84
33
(b) A person sentenced under this subdivision shall
34
not be e l igible for conditional release or parole until he
35
or she has served at least five years of imprisonment;
36
(3) Results in serious physical injury to the child,
37
in which case the offense is a class B felony; or
38
(4) Results in the death of a child, in which case the
39
offense i s a class A felony.
1
568.060. 1. As used in this section, the following
2
terms shall m e an:
3
(1) "Abuse", the infliction of physical, sexual, or
4
mental i n jury against a child by any person eighteen years
5
of age or older. For purposes of this section, abuse shall
6
not include inju r y inflicted on a child by accidental means
7
by a person with care, custody, or control of the child, or
8
discipline of a child by a person with care, custody, or
9
control of the child, including spanking, in a reasonable
10
manner;
11
(2) "Abusive head trauma", a serious physical injury
12
to the h e ad or brain caused by any means, including but not
13
limited to shaking, jerking, pushing, pulling, slamming,
14
hitting, or kicking;
15
(3) "Mental injury", an injury to the intellectual or
16
psycholo g ical capacity or the emotional condition of a child
17
as evidenced by an observable and substantial impairment of
18
the ability of the child to function within his or her
19
normal range of performance or behavior;
20
(4) "Neglect", the failure to provide, by those
21
responsi b le for the care, custody, and control of a child
22
under the age of eighteen years, the care reasonable and
23
necessary to maintain the physical and mental health of the

SS#3 SB 888 85
24
child, when such failure presents a substantial probability
25
that death or physical injury or sexual injury would result;
26
(5) "Physical injury", physical pain, illness, or any
27
impairme n t of physical condition, including but not limited
28
to bruising, lacerations, hematomas, welts, or permanent or
29
temporary disfigurement and impairment of any bodily
30
function or organ;
31
(6) "Serious emotional injury", an injury that creates
32
a substa n tial risk of temporary or permanent medical or
33
psychological damage, manifested by impairment of a
34
behavioral, cognitive, or physical condition. Serious
35
emotional injury shall be established by test i mony of
36
qualified experts upon the reasonable expectation of
37
probable harm to a reasonable degree of medical or
38
psychological certainty;
39
(7) "Serious physical injury", a physical injury that
40
creates a substantial risk of death or that causes serious
41
disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the
42
function of any part of the body.
43
2. A person commits the offense of abuse or neglect of
44
a child if such person knowingly causes a child who is less
45
than eighteen years of age:
46
(1) To suffer physical or mental injury as a result of
47
abuse or neglect; or
48
(2) To be placed in a situation in which the child may
49
suffer p h ysical or mental injury as the result of abuse or
50
neglect.
51
3. A person commits the offense of abuse or neglect of
52
a child if such person recklessly causes a child who is less
53
than eighteen years of age to suffer from abusive head
54
trauma.

SS#3 SB 888 86
55
4. A person does not commit the offense of abuse or
56
neglect of a child by virtue of the sole fact that the
57
person delivers or allows the delivery of a child to a
58
provider of emergency services.
59
5. (1) A person does not commit the offense of abuse
60
or negl e ct o f a child by virtue of the sole fact that the
61
person allows the child to engage in independent activities
62
without adult supervision and the person is a parent to the
63
child or is responsible for the child's care, provided that
64
the:
65
(a) Independent activities are appropriate based on
66
the chil d 's age, maturity, and physical and mental
67
abilities; and
68
(b) Lack of adult supervision does not constitute
69
conduct t hat is so grossly negligent as to endanger the
70
health or safety of the child.
71
(2) As used in this subsection, "independent
72
activiti e s" shall include traveling to or from school or
73
nearby locations by bicycle or on foot, playing outdoors, or
74
remaining at home for a reasonable period of time without
75
adult supervision.
76
6. The offense of abuse or neglect of a child is:
77
(1 ) A class D felony[, without eligibility for
78
probatio n , parole, or conditional release until the
79
defendant has served no less than one year of such
80
sentence], unless the person has previously been found
81
guilty of a violation of this section or of a violation of
82
the law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits the same or
83
similar conduct or the injury inflicted on the child is a
84
serious emotional injury or a serious physical injury, in
85
which case abuse or neglect of a child is a class B felony,

SS#3 SB 888 87
86
without eligibility for probation or parole until the
87
defendant has served not less than five years of such
88
sentence; or
89
(2) A class A felony if the child dies as a result of
90
injuries sustained from conduct chargeable under the
91
provisions of this section.
92
7. Notwithstanding subsection 6 of this section to the
93
contrar y , the offense of abuse or neglect of a child is a
94
class A felony, without eligibility for probation, parole,
95
or conditional release until the defendant has served not
96
less than fifteen years of such sentence, if:
97
(1) The injury is a serious emotional injury or a
98
serious p hysical injury;
99
(2) The child is less than fourteen years of age; and
100
(3) The injury is the result of sexual abuse or sexual
101
abuse in the first degree as defined under section 566.100
102
or sexual exploitation of a minor as defined under section
103
573.023.
104
8. The circuit or prosecuting attorney may refer a
105
person w ho is suspected of abuse or neglect of a child to an
106
appropriate public or private agency for treatment or
107
counseling so long as the agency has consented to taking
108
such referrals. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the
109
discretion of t h e circuit or prosecuting attorney to
110
prosecute a person who has been referred for treatment or
111
counseling pursuant to this subsection.
112
9. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter
113
the req u irement that every element of any crime referred to
114
herein must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt.

SS#3 SB 888 88
115
10. Discipline, including spanking administered in a
116
reasonab l e manner, shall not be construed to be abuse under
117
this section.
1
589.425. 1. A person commits the crime of failing to
2
register as a sex offender when the person is required to
3
register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 and fails to
4
comply with any requirement of sections 589.400 to 589.425.
5
Failing to register as a sex offender is a class E felony
6
unless the person is required to register based on having
7
committed an offense in chapter 566 which was an
8
unclassified felony, a class A or B felony, or a felony
9
involving a child under the age of fourteen, in which case
10
it is a class D felony.
11
2. A person commits the crime of failing to register
12
as a se x offender as a second offense by failing to comply
13
with any requirement of sections 589.400 to 589.425 and he
14
or she has previously pled guilty to or has previously been
15
found guilty of failing to register as a sex offender.
16
Failing to register as a sex offender as a second offen se is
17
a class E felony unless the person is required to register
18
based on having committed an offense in chapter 566, or an
19
offense in any other state or foreign country, or under
20
federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction, which if
21
committed in this state would be an offense under chapter
22
566 which was an unclassified felony, a class A or B felony,
23
or a felony involving a child under the age of fourteen, in
24
which case it is a class D felony.
25
3. (1) A person commits the crime of failing to
26
registe r as a sex offender as a third offense by failing to
27
meet the requirements of sections 589.400 to 589.425 and he
28
or she has, on two or more occasions, previously pled guilty

SS#3 SB 888 89
29
to or has previously been found guilty of failing to
30
register as a sex offender. Failing to register as a sex
31
offender as a third offense is a class A felony, which shall
32
be punished by a term of imprisonment of not less than ten
33
years and not more than thirty years.
34
(2) No court may suspend the imposition or execution
35
of sente n ce of a person who pleads guilty to or is found
36
guilty of failing to register as a sex offender as a third
37
offense. No court may sentence such person to pay a fine in
38
lieu of a term of imprisonment.
39
(3) [A person sentenced under this subsection shall
40
not be el i gi ble for condition al rel ease o r parole un til he
41
or s he has serve d at least two y ears of imp risonme nt.
42
( 4)] Upon r ele ase, a n of fender w ho has committed
43
failing t o register as a sex offender as a third offense
44
shall be electronically monitored as a mandatory condition
45
of supervision. Electronic monitoring may be based on a
46
global position i ng system or any other technology which
47
identifies and records the offender's location at all times.
1
Section 1. In the event that any section, provision,
2
clause, phrase, or word of this act or the application
3
thereof is declared invalid under the Constitution of the
4
United States or the Constitution of the State of Missouri,
5
it is the intent of the general assembly that the remaining
6
sections of this act remain in force and effect as far as
7
they are capable of being carried into execution as intended
8
by the general assembly. The general assembly hereby
9
declares that it would h a ve passed each section, provision,
10
clause, phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact
11
that any one or more sections, provisions, clauses, phrases,

SS#3 SB 888 90
12
or words of this act or the application of this act would be
13
declared unenforceable, unconstitutional, or invalid.
1
Section B. The repeal and reenactment of sections
2
558.011, 558.01 9 , and 558.031 of this act shall become
3
effective on January 1, 2028.
